[2001]
Umm Salama, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (way peace be upon him), reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying like the hadith transmitted by Abu Usama, but with this addition that she said: "When Abu Salama died I said: Who is better than Abu Salama, the Companion of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and Allah decided for me and I said (these words contained in the supplication mentioned above) and I was married to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[2002]
Umm Salama reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Whenever you visit the sick or the dead, supplicate for good because angels say "Amen" to whatever you say. She added: When Abu Salama died, I went to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, Abu Salama has died. He told me to recite: "O Allah ! forgive me and him (Abu Salama) and give me a better substitute than he." So I said (this), and Allah gave me in exchange Muhammad, who is better for me than him (Abu Salama).
[2003]
Umm Salama reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon came to Abu Salama (as he died). His eyes were fixedly open. He closed them, and then said: When the soul is taken away the sight follows it. Some of the people of his family wept and wailed. So he said: Do not supplicate for yourselves anything but good, for angels say "Amen" to what you say. He then said: O Allah, forgive Abu Salama, raise his degree among those who are rightly guided, grant him a successor in his descendants who remain. Forgive us and him, O Lord of the Universe, and make his grave spacious, and grant him light in it.
[2004]
This hadith has been narrated by Khalid al Hadhdha' with the same chain of transmitters but with this alteration that he said: (O Allah !) let Thee be the caretaker of what is left by him, and he said: Grant him expansion of the grave, but he did not say: Make his grave spacious. Khalid said: He supplicated for the seventh (thing too) which I have forgotten.
[2005]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Did you not see when the man died and his eyes were fixedly open? He (Abu Huraira) said: Yes. He (the Holy Prophet) said: It is due to the fact that when (the soul leaves the body) his eyesight follows the soul.
[2006]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of 'Ala' with the same chain of transmitters.
[2007]
Umm Salama reported: When Abu Salama died I said: I am a stranger in a strange land; I shall weep for him in a manner that would be talked of. I made preparation for weeping for him when a woman from the upper side of the city came there who intended to help me (in weeping). She happened to come across the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he said: Do you intend to bring the devil into a house from which Allah has twice driven him out? I (Umm Salama), therefore, refrained from weeping and I did not weep.
[2008]
Usama b. Zaid reported: While we were with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), one of his daughters sent to him (the Messenger) to call him and inform him that her child or her son was dying. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) told the messenger to go back and tell her that what Allah had taken belonged to Him, and to him belonged what He granted; and He has an appointed time for everything. So you (the messenger) order her to show endurance and seek reward from Allah. The messenger came back and said: She adjures him to come to her. He got up to go accompanied by Sa'd b. 'Ubada, Mu'adh b. Jabal, and I also went along with them. The child was lifted to him and his soul was feeling as restless as if it was in an old (waterskin). His (Prophet's) eyes welled up with tears. Sa'd said: What is this, Messenger of Allah? He replied: This is compassion which Allah has placed in the hearts of His servants, and God shows compassion only to those of His servants who are compassionate.
[2009]
This hadith has been narrated by another chain of transmitters on the authority of 'Asim al-Ahwal.
[2010]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar said that Sa'd b. Ubada complained of illness. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to visit him accompanied by 'Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf, Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas and 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud. As he entered (his room) he found him in a swoon. Upon this he said: Has he died? They said: Messenger of Allah, it is not so. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) wept. When the people saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) weeping, they also began to weep. He said. Listen, Allah does not punish for the tears that the eye sheds or the grief the heart feels, but He punishes for this (pointing to his tongue), or He may show mercy.
[2011]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported: While we were sitting with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), a person, one of the Ansar, came to him and greeted him. The Ansari then turned back. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: o brother of Ansar, how is my brother Sa'd be 'Ubada? He said: He is better. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Who amongst you would visit him? He (the Holy Prophet) stood up and we also got up along with him, and we were more than ten persons. We had neither shoes with us, nor socks, nor caps, nor shirts. We walked on the barren land till we came to him. The people around him kept away till the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and his Companions with him came near him (Sa'd b. 'Ubada).
[2012]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Endurance is to be shown at the first blow.
[2013]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to a woman who had been weeping for her (dead) child, and said to her: Fear Allah and show endurance. She (not recognising him) said: You have not been afflicted as I have been. When he (the Holy Prophet) had departed, it was said to her that he was the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), she was mortally shocked. She came to his door and she did not find doorkeepers at his door. She said: Messenger of Allah. I did not recognise you. He said: Endurance is to be shown at first blow, or at the first blow.
[2014]
A hadith like this is narrated with the same chain of transmitters but with the addition of these words: "The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by a woman (who was sitting) by the side of a grave."
[2015]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported that Hafsa wept for 'Umar (when he was about to due). He ('Umar) said: Be quiet, my daughter. Don't you know that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: "The dead is punished because of his family's weeping over it"?
[2016]
Umar reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The dead is punished in the grave because of wailing on it.
[2017]
The same hadith is narrated on the authority of 'Umar through another chain of transmitters.
[2018]
Ibn 'Umar reported: When 'Umar was wounded he fainted, and there was a loud lamentation over him. When he regained consciousness he said: Didn't you know that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: "The dead is punished because of the weeping of the living" ?
[2019]
Abu Burda narrated on the authority of his father that when 'Umar was wounded Suhaib uttered (loudly in lamentation): O brother! Upon this 'Umar said: Suhaib, did you not know that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: "The dead is punished because of the lamentation of the living"?
[2020]
Abu Musa reported that when 'Umar was wounded, there came Suhaib from his house and went to 'Umar and stood by his side, and began to wail. Upon this 'Umar said: What are you weeping for? Are you weeping for me? He said: By Allah, it is for you that I weep, O Commander of the believers. He said: By Allah, you already know that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: He who is lamented upon is punished. I made a mention of it to Musa b. Talha, and he said that 'A'isha told that it concerned the Jews (only).
[2021]
Anas reported that when 'Umar b. Khattab was wounded Hafsa lamented for him. Upon this he said: O Hafsa, did you not hear the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying: "One who is lamented would be punished"? Suhaib also lamented over him. 'Umar told him also: O Suhaib, didn't you know that one who is lamented is punished?
[2022]
'Abdullah b. Abu Mulaika reported: I was sitting by the side of Ibn 'Umar, and we were waiting for the bier of Umm Aban, daughter of 'Uthman, and there was also 'Amr b. 'Uthman. In the meanwhile there came Ibn 'Abbas led by a guide. I conceive that he was informed of the place of Ibn 'Umar. So he came till he sat by my side. While I was between them (Ibn 'Abbas and Ibn 'Umar) there came the noise (of wailing) from the house. Upon this Ibn 'Umar said (that is, he pointed out to 'Amr that he should stand and forbid them, for): I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: The dead is punished because of the lamentation of his family. 'Abdullah made it general (what was said for a particular occasion). Ibn 'Abbas said: When we were with the Commander of the believers, 'Umar b. Khattab, we reached Baida', and there was a man under the shadow of the tree. He said to me: Go and inform me who is that person. So I went and (found) that he was Suhaib. I returned to him and said: You commanded me to find out for you who that was, and he is Suhaib. He (Hadrat 'Umar) said: Command him to see us. I said: He has family along with him. He said: (That is of no account) even if he has family along with him. So he (the narrator) told him to see (the Commander of the believers and his party). When we came (to Medina), it was before long that the Commander of the believers was wounded, and Suhaib came weeping and crying: Alas for the brother, alas for the companion. Upon this 'Umar said: Didn't you know, or didn't you hear, that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: "The dead is punished because of the lamentation of his family " ? Then 'Abdullah made it general and 'Umar told it of certain occasions. So I ('Abdullah b. Abu Mulaika) stood up and went to 'A'isha and told her what Ibn 'Umar had said. Upon this she said: I swear by Allah that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) never said that dead would be punished because of his family's lamenting (for him). What he said was that Allah would increase the punishment of the unbeliever because of his family's lamenting for him. Verily it is Allah Who has caused laughter and weeping. No bearer of a burden will bear another's burden. Ibn Abu Mulaika said that al-Qasim b. Muhammad said that when the words of 'Umar and Ibn 'Umar were conveyed to 'A'Isha, she said: You have narrated it to me from those who are neither liar nor those suspected of lying but (sometimes) hearing misleads.
[2023]
'Abdullah b. Abu Mulaika said: The daughter of 'Uthman b. 'Affan died in Mecca. We came to attend her (funeral). Ibn 'Umar and Ibn 'Abbas were also present there, and I was sitting between them. He added: I (first sat) by the side of one of them, then the other one came and he sat by my side. 'Abdullah b. 'Umar said to 'Amr b. 'Uthman who was sitting opposite to him: Will you not prevent the people from lamenting, for the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: "The dead is punished because of the lamenting of his family for him"? Ibn 'Abbas then said that Umar used to say someting of that nature, and then narrated saying: I proceeded from Mecca along with 'Umar till we reached al-Baida' and there was a party of riders under the shade of a tree. He said (to me): Go and find out who this party is. I cast a glance and there was Suhaib (in that party). So I informed him ('Umar) about it. He said: Call him to me. So I went back to Suhaib and said: Go and meet the Commander of the believers. When 'Umar was wounded, Suhaib came walling: Alas, for the brother ! alas for the companion ! 'Umar said: O Suhaib, do you wail for me, whereas the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: "The dead would be punished on account of the lamentation of the (members of his family)"? Ibn 'Abbas said: When 'Umar died I made a mention of it to 'A'isha. She said: May Allah have mercy upon 'Umar ! I swear by Allah that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) never said that Allah would punish the believer because of the weeping (of any one of the members of his family), but he said that Allah would increase the punishment of the unbeliever because of the weeping of his family over him. 'A'isha said: The Qur'an is enough for you (when it states): "No bearer of burden will bear another's burden" (vi. 164). Thereupon Ibn 'Abbas said: Allah is He Who has caused laughter and weeping. Ibn Abu Mulaika said: By Allah, Ibn 'Umar said nothing.
[2024]
'Amr reported on the authority of Ibn Abu Mulaika: We were with the bier of Umm Aban, daughter of 'Uthman, and the rest of the hadith is the same, but he did not narrate it as a marfu' hadith on the authority of 'Umar from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as it was narrated by Ayyub and Ibn Juraij, and the hadith narrated by them (Ayyub and Ibn Juraij) is more complete than that of 'Amr.
[2025]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The dead is punished because of the lamentation of the living.
[2026]
Hisham b. 'Urwa narrated on the authority of his father that the saying of Ibn 'Umar, viz. "The dead would be punished because of the lamentation of his family over him" was mentioned to 'A'isha. Upon this she said: May Allah have mercy upon Abu 'Abd al-Rahman (the kunya of Ibn 'Umar) that he heard something but could not retain it (well). (The fact is) that the bier of a Jew passed before the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and (the members of his family) were waiting over him. Upon this he said: You are wailing and he is being punished.
[2027]
Hisham narrated on the authority of his father that it was mentioned to 'A'isha that Ibn 'Umar had narrated as marfu' hadith from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) that the dead would be punished in the grave because of the lamentation of his family for him. Upon this she said: He (Ibn 'Umar) missed (the point). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had (in fact) said: He (the dead) is punished for his faults or for his sins, and the members of his family are wailing for him now. (This misunderstanding of Ibn 'Umar is similar to his saying:) The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood by the well in which were lying the dead bodies of those polytheists who had been killed on the Day of Badr, and he said to them what he had to say, i.e.: They hear what I say. But he (Ibn 'Umar) misunderstood. The Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) had only said: They (the dead) understand that what I used to say to them was truth. She then recited: "Certainly, thou canst not make the dead hear the call" (xxvii. 80), nor can you make those hear who are in the graves, nor can you inform them when they have taken their seats in Hell.
[2028]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn 'Urwa with the same chain of transmitters. The hadith narrated by Abu Usama is more complete.
[2029]
'Amra daughter of 'Abd al Rahman narrated that she heard (from) 'A'isha and made a mention to her about 'Abdullah b. 'Umar as saying: The dead is punished because of the lamentation of the living. Upon this 'A'isha said: May Allah have mercy upon the father of 'Abd al-Rahman (Ibn 'Umar). He did not tell a lie, but he forgot or made a mistake. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by a (dead) Jewess who was being lamented. Upon this he said: They weep over her and she is being punished in the grave.
[2030]
'Ali b. Rabi'a reported that the first one who was lamented upon in Kufa was Qaraza b. Ka'b. Mughira b. Shu'ba said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying: He who is lamented upon would be punished because of the lamentation for him on the Day of judgment.
[2031]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Mughira b. Shu'ba from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[2032]
This hadith has been narrated from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) through another chain of transmitters.
[2033]
Abu Malik al-Ash'ari reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Among my people there are four characteristics belonging to pre-Islamic period which they do not abandon: boasting of high rank, reviling other peoples' genealogies, seeking rain by stars, and walling. And he (further) said: If the wailing woman does not repent before she dies, she will be made to stand on the Day of Resurrection wearing a garment of pitch and a chemise of mange.
[2034]
'A'isha reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was told that Ibn Haritha, Ja'far b. Abu Talib and Abdullah b. Rawaha were killed, he sat down, showing signs of grief. She (further) said: I was looking (at him) through the crevice of the door. A man came to him and mentioned that Ja'far's women were lamenting. He (the Holy Prophet) commanded him to go and forbid them (to do so). So he went away but came back and told (him) that they did not obey (him). He commanded him a second time to go and forbid them (to do so). He again went but came back to him and said: I swear by God, Messenger of Allah, that they have overpowered us. She ('A'isha) said that she thought the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had told (her) to throw dust in their mouths. Thereupon 'A'isha said: May Allah humble you ! You did not do what Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ordered you, nor did you stop annoying Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[2035]
This hadith has been narrated by Yahya b. Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters like one narrated by 'Abd al-'Aziz (with the change of these words): "You did not spare the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) the botheration."
[2036]
Umm 'Atiyya reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took a promise from us along with the oath of Allegiance that we would not lament. But only five among us fulfilled the promise (and they are) Umm Sulaim, and Umm al-'Ala', and the daughter of Abu Sabra the wife of Mu'adh, or daughter of Abu Sabra and wife of Mu'adh.
[2037]
Umm 'Atiyya reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took pledge from us (including this promise) that we would not lament. Only five amongst us fulfilled the promise, and one of them (who fulfilled the promise) was Umm Sulaim.
[2038]
Hafsa narrated on the authority of Umm 'Atiyya that she said: When this verse was revealed: "When believing women came to thee giving thee a pledge that they will not associate aught with Allah, and will not disobey thee in good" (lx. 12), she (Umm Atiyya) said: In (this pledge) was also included wailing. I said: Messenger of Allah I except members of such a tribe who helped me (in lamentation) during pre-Islamic days, there is left no alternative for me, but that I should also help them. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: (Yes) but only in case of the members of such a tribe.
[2039]
Umm 'Atiyya reported: We were forbidden to follow the bier, but it was not made absolute on us.
[2040]
Umm 'Atiyya reported: We were refrained from following the bier, but it was not made absolute on us.
[2041]
Umm 'Atiyya reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to us when we were bathing his daughter, and he told us: Wash her with water and (with the leaves of) the lote tree, three or five times, or more than that if you think fit, and put camphor or something like camphor in the last washing; then inform me when you have finished. So when we had finished, we informed him, and he gave to us his (own) under-garment saying: "Put it next her body."
[2042]
Umm 'Atiyya reported: We braided her hair in three plaits.
[2043]
Umm 'Atiyya reported: One of the daughters of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) died. And in the hadith transmitted by Ibn 'Ulayya (the words are): The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to us and we were washing his daughter. And in the hadith transmitted by Malik (the words are): There came in (our apartment) the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) when his daughter died. The rest of the hadith is the same as narrated by Yazid b. Zurai' from Ayyub from Muhammad from Umm 'Atiyya.
[2044]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by Hafsa on the authority of Umm 'Atiyya with the exception (of these words that the Holy Prophet asked them to wash her dead body): "three times, five times, seven times, or more than that, if you deem fit:" Hafsa (further) said on the authority of Umm 'Atiyya: We braided (the hair) of her head in three plaits.
[2045]
Umm 'Atiyya reported: We washed her an odd number of times, i.e. three, five or seven times; and Umm 'Atiyya (further) said: We braided her hair in three plaits.
[2046]
Umm 'Atiyya reported: When Zainab the daughter of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) died, he said to us: Wash her odd number of times, i.e. three or five times, and put camphor or something-like camphor at the fifth time, and after you have washed her inform me. So we informed him and he gave us his under-garment, saying: "Put it next her body."
[2047]
Umm 'Atiyya reported: There came to us the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as we were washing one of his daughters. So he said: Wash her (dead body) an odd number of times, five times or more than that, the rest of the hadith is the same. She (further) said: We braided her hair in three plaits: (two) on the sides of her head and one on her forehead.
[2048]
Umm 'Atiyya reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) asked her to wash his daughter, he told her to start from the right side, and with those parts of the body over which Wudu' is performed.
[2049]
Umm 'Atiyya reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to them (the women) in regard to the washing of his daughter to start from the right side and with those parts of the body over which Wudu' is performed.
[2050]
Khabbab al-Aratt reported: We migrated with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the path of Allah seeking Allah's pleasure alone. Thus our reward was assured with Allah. And amongst us were those who spent life (in such a state of piety and austerity) that nothing consumed their reward. Mus'ab b. 'Umair was one of them. He was killed on the Day of Uhud, and nothing but a woollen cloak was found to shroud him. When we covered his head with it, his feet became uncovered, and when we covered his feet, his head was uncovered. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Place it (this cloak) on the side of his head and cover his feet with grass. And there is one amongst us for whom the fruit is ripened and he enjoys it.
[2051]
A hadith like this has been narrated by 'Uyaina on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[2052]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was shrouded in three cotton garments of white Yamani stuff from Sahul, among which was neither a shirt nor a turban; and so far as Hullah is concerned there was some doubt about it in the minds of people, that it was brought for him in order to shroud him with it, but it was abandoned, and he was shrouded in three cotton garments of white Yamani stuff from Sahul. Then 'Abdullah b. Abu Bakr got it and said: I would keep it in order to shroud myself in it. He then said: If Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, would have desired it for His Apostle, he would have been shrouded with it. So he sold it and gave its price in charity.
[2053]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was wrapped in a Yamani wrapper which belonged to 'Abdullah b Abu Bakr; then it was removed from him, and he was shrouded in three cotton sheets of white Yamani stuff from Sahul among which was neither a shirt nor a turban. 'Abdullah took up the Hullah and said: I would be shrouded in it, but then said: How is it that I should be shrouded in it in which the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was not shrouded ! So he gave it in charity.
[2054]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters, but in the hadith narrated by him there is no mention of the story of 'Abdullah b. Abu Bakr.
[2055]
Abu Salama said: I asked 'A'isha with how many garments the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was shourded. She said: With three garments of Sahul.
[2056]
'A'isha reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upom him) died, he was covered with a Yamani wrapper.
[2057]
This hadith has been narrated by Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[2058]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) one day in the course of his sermon made mention of a person among his Companions who had died and had been wrapped in a shroud not long (enough to cover his whole body) and was buried during the night. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) reprimanded (the audience) that a person was buried during the night (in a state that) funeral prayer could not be offered (over him by the Messenger of Allah). (And this is permissible only) when it becomes a dire necessity for a man. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) also said: When any one of you shrouds his brother, he should shroud him well.
[2059]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Make haste at a funeral; if the dead person was good, it is a good state to which you are sending him on; but if he was otherwise it is an evil of which you are ridding yourselves.
[2060]
This hadith has been narrated by another chain of transmitters except with this variation (of words) that in the hadith narrated by Ma'mar (the words are): "I do not know whether the hadith is marfu'."
[2061]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger as saying: Hasten at a funeral, for if (the dead person) is good, you would (soon) bring him close to the good. And if it is otherwise, it is an evil of which you are ridding yourselves.
[2062]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who attends the funeral till the prayer is offered for (the dead), for him is the reward of one qirat, and he who attends (and stays) till he is buried, for him is the reward of two qirats. It was said: What are the qirats? He said: They are equivalent to two huge mountains. Two other narrators added: Ibn 'Umar used to pray and then depart (without waiting for the burial of the dead). When the tradition of Abu Huraira reached him, he said: "We have lost many qirats."
[2063]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of narrators up to these words: "two great mountains." No mention is made of what followed (these words); and in the hadith transmitted by 'Abd al- A'la (the words are): "till (the burial) is complete." In the hadith transmitted by 'Abd ar-Razzaq (the words are): "till he is placed in the grave."
[2064]
This hadith is narrated on thp authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters (with these words): "He who followed it (the bier) till he (the dead) is buried."
[2065]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who offered prayer over the dead, but did not follow the bier, for him is the reward of one qirat, and he who followed it, for him is the reward of two qirats. It was asked what the qirats were. He said: The smaller amongst the two is equivalent to Uhud.
[2066]
Nafi' narrated that it was said to Ibn 'Umar that Abu Huraira reported to have heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who follows the bier, for him is the reward of one qirat. Ibn 'Umar said: Abu Huraira narrated it too often. So he sent (a messenger to) 'A'isha to ascertain (the fact). She ('A'isha) testified Abu Huraira. Ibn 'Umar said: We missed so many qirats.
[2067]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who offers prayer for the dead, for him is (the reward of) one qirat; and he who follows the bier till it is placed in the grave, for him (is the reward of) two qirats. I (Abu Hazim, one of the narrators) raid: Abu Huraira, what is this qirat? He said: It is like the hill of Uhud.
[2068]
Dawud b. 'Amir b. Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas reported on the authority of his father that while he was sitting along with 'Abdullah b. 'Umar, Khabbab, the owner of Maqsura, said: Ibn 'Umar, do you hear what Abu Huraira says that he heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: "He who goes out with the bier when taken out from its residence and offers prayer for it and he then follows it till it is buried, he would have two qirats of reward, each qirat being equivalent to Uhud; and he who, after having offered prayer, (directly) came back would have his reward (as great) as Uhud"? Ibn 'Umar sent Khabbab to 'A'isha in order to ask her about the words of Abu Huraira (and also told him) to come back to him (Ibn 'Umar) and inform him what 'A'isha said. (In the meanwhile) Ibn 'Umar took up a handful of pebbles and turned them over in his hand till the messenger (Khabbab) came back to him and told (him) that 'A'isha testified (the statement of) Abu Huraira. Ibn 'Umar threw the pebbles he had in his hand on the ground and then said: We missed a large number of qirats.
[2069]
Thauban, the freed slave of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who offered prayer for the dead, for him is the reward of one qirat, and he who attended its burial, he would have two qirats as his reward. And qirat is equivalent to Uhud.
[2070]
This hadith has been narrated by Qatada with the same chain of transmitters. And in the hadith transmitted by Sa'id and Hisham, (the words are): "The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was asked about qirat, and he said: It is equivalent to Uhud."
[2071]
'A'isha reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saying: If a company of Muslims numbering one hundred pray over a dead person, all of them interceding for him, their intercession for him will be accepted.
[2072]
'Abdullah b. 'Abbas reported that his son died in Qudaid or 'Usfan. He said to Kuraib to see as to how many people had gathered there for his (funeral). He (Kuraib) said: So I went out and I informed him about the people who had gathered there. He (Ibn 'Abbas) said: Do you think they are forty? He (Kuraib) said: Yes. Ibn 'Abbas then said to them: Bring him (the dead body) out for I have heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If any Muslim dies and forty men who associate nothing with Allah stand over his prayer (they offer prayer over him), Allah will accept them as intercessors for him.
[2073]
Anas b. Malik reported: There passed a bier (being carried by people) and it was lauded in good terms. Upon this the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: It has become certain, it has become certain, it has become certain. And there passed a bier and it was condemned in bad words. Upon this the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: It has become certain, it has become certain, it has become certain. 'Umar said: May my father and mother be ransom for you ! There passed a bier and it was praised in good terms, and you said: It has become certain, it has become certain, it has become certain. And there passed a bier and it was condemned in bad words, and you said: It has become certain, it has become certain, it has become certain. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) said: He whom you praised in good terms, Paradise has become certain for him, and he whom you condemned in bad words, Hell has become certain for him. You are Allah's witnesses in the earth, you are Allah's witnesses in the earth, you are Allah's witnesses in the earth.
[2074]
This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters.
[2075]
Qatada b. Rib'i reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Whenever a bier passed before him, he said: He is the one to find relief and the one with (the departure of him) other will find relief. They said: Apostle of Allah, who is al-Mustarih and al-Mustarah? Upon this he said: The believing servant finds relief from the troubles of the world, and in the death of a wicked person, the people, towns, trees and animals find rellef.
[2076]
In the hadith transmitted by Yahya b. Sa'id on the authority of Qatada (the words are): (The believing servant) finds relief from the troubles of the world and its hardships and (gets into) the Mercy of Allah.
[2077]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) gave the people news of the death of Negus on the day he died, and he took them out to the place of prayer and observed four takbirs.
[2078]
Abu Huraira reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) gave us the news of the death of Negus, the ruler of Abyssinia, on the day when he died, and he said (to us): Beg pardon for your brother. Ibn Shihab said that Sa'id b. Musayyib had told that Abu Huraira had narrated to him that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) drew them up in a row in a place of prayer, and offered prayer and recited four takbirs for him.
[2079]
This hadith is narrated through another chain of transmitters.
[2080]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) offered prayer for Ashama, the Negus, and recited four takbirs.
[2081]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There died today the pious servant of Allah, Ashama. So he stood up and led us in (funeral prayer) over him.
[2082]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A brother of yours has died, so stand up and offer prayer over him. So we stood up and drew ourselves up into two rows.
[2083]
'Imran b. Husain reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A brother of yours has died; so stand up and offer prayer for him, i.e. Negus. And in the hadith transmitted by Zubair (the words are): "Your brother."
[2084]
Sha'bi reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed prayer over a grave after the dead was buried and he recited four takbirs over him. Shaibani said: I said to Sha'bi: Who narrated it to you? He said: An authentic one, 'Abdullah b. 'Abbas. This is the word of a hasan hadith. In the narration of Ibn Numair (the words are): The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went to the grave which had been newly prepared and prayed over it, and they also prayed who were behind him and he recited four takbirs. I said to 'Amir: Who narrated it to you? He said: An authentic one who saw him, i e. Ibn 'Abbas.
[2085]
This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters, but in one of them (these words are found): "The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited four takbirs."
[2086]
The hadith as narrated by Shaibani has been narrated through another chain of transmitters.
[2087]
Anas reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed prayer on the grave.
[2088]
It is narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that a dark-complexioned woman (or a youth) used to sweep the mosque. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) missed her (or him) and inquired about her (or him). The people told him that she (or he) had died. He asked why they did not inform him, and it appears as if they had treated her (or him) or her (or his) affairs as of little account. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Lead me to her (or his) gtave. They led him to that place and he said prayer over her (or him) and then remarked: Verily, these graves are full of darkness for their dwellers. Verily, the Mighty and Glorious Allah illuminates them for their occupants by reason of my prayer over them.
[2089]
It is narrated on the authority of 'Abd al-Rahman b. Abu Laila that Zaid used to recite four takbirs on our funerals and he recited five takbirs on one funeral. I asked him the reason (for this variation), to which he replied: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) recited thus.
[2090]
It is narrated on the authority of 'Amir Ibn Rabi'a (may Allah be pleased with him) that the Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: Whenever you see a funeral procession, stand up for that until it moves away or is lowered on the ground.
[2091]
It is narrated on the authority of 'Amir ibn Rabi'a (may Allah be pleased with him) that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: Should any one of you come across a funeral procession, and if he does not intend to accompany it, he must stand up until it passes by him or is placed upon the ground before it passes him.
[2092]
It is reported on the authority of Ibn Juraij that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: Should anyone amongst you see a bier he must stand up so long as it is within sight in case he does not intend to follow it.
[2093]
It is narrated on the authority of Abu Sa'id al-Khudri that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: When you follow a bier, do not sit until it is placed on the (ground).
[2094]
It is narrated on the authority of Abu Sa'id al-Khudri that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: Whenever you come across a bier you should stand up, and he who follows it should not sit down till it is placed on the ground.
[2095]
It is narrated on the authority of Jabir ibn 'Abdullah: There passed a bier and the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) stood up for it and we also stood up along with him. We said: Messenger of Allah, that was the bier of a Jewess. Upon this he remarked: Verily, death is a matter of consternation, so whenever you come across a bier stand up.
[2096]
Ibn Juraij told me that Abu Zubair heard Jabir say that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) kept standing for a bier until it disappeared.
[2097]
Again Abu Zubair heard Jabir say that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) and his Companions kept standing for a bier of a Jew until it disappeared from sight.
[2098]
It is narrated on the authority of Ibn Abu Laila that while Qais b. Sa'd and Sahl b. Hunaif were both in Qadislyya a bier passed by them and they both stood up. They were told that it was the bier of one of the people of the land (non-Muslim). They said that a bier passed before the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) and he stood up. He was told that he (the dead man) was a Jew. Upon this he remarked: Was he not a human being or did he not have a soul? And in the hadith narrated by 'Amr b. Murra with the same chain of transmitters, (the words) are: "There passed a bier before us."
[2099]
It is narrated on the authority of Waqid: Nafi' b. Jubair saw me and we were standing for a bier, while he was sitting and waiting for the bier to be placed on the ground. He said to me: What makes you keep standing? I said: I am waiting that the bier may be placed on the ground (and I am doing that) on the hadith narrated to me by Abu Sa'id al-Khudri. Upon this Nafi' said: Verily, Mas'ud b. Hakam reported to me on the authority of Hadrat 'Ali b. Abu Talib that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) stood up first (for a bier) and then sat down.
[2100]
Mas'ud b. al-Hakam al-Ansari informed Nafi' that he had heard Hadrat 'Ali (may Allah be pleased with him), son of Abu Talib, say about the biers: Verily, the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) used to stand first but later on kept sitting; but it is also narrated that Nafi' ibn Jubair saw Waqid b. 'Amr standing for a bier till it was placed down.
[2101]
This hadith has been narrated by Yahya b. Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters.
[2102]
It is narrated on the authority of Muhammad b. Munkadir that he said: I heard from Mas'ud b. al-Hakam who narrated it on the authority of Hadrat 'Ali that he said: We saw the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) stood up for a (bier) and we also stood up; he sat down and we too sat down.
[2103]
This hadith has been narrated by Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[2104]
Jubair b. Nufair says: I heard it from 'Auf b. Malik that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said prayer on the dead body, and I remembered his prayer: "O Allah ! forgive him, have mercy upon him, give him peace and absolve him. Receive him with honour and make his grave spacious; wash him with water, snow and hail. Cleanse him from faults as Thou wouldst cleanse a white garment from impurity. Requite him with an abode more excellent than his abode, with a family better than his family, and with a mate better than his mate. Admit him to the Garden, and protect him from the torment of the grave and the torment of the Fire." ('Auf bin Malik) said: I earnestly desired that I were this dead body.
[2105]
A hadith like this has been narrated through another chain of transmitters.
[2106]
'Anas b. Malik said: I heard the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) say (while offering prayer on a dead body): O Allah ! forgive him, have mercy upon him. Give him peace and absolve him. Receive him with honour and make his grave spacious. Wash him with water, snow and hail, cleanse him from faults as is cleaned a white garment from impurity. Requite him with an abode more excellent than his abode, with a family better than his family, and with a mate better than his mate, and save him from the trial of the grave and torment of Hell. 'Auf b. Malik said: I earnestly desired that I were the dead person to receive the prayer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as this dead body had (received).
[2107]
Samura b. Jundub said: I prayed behind the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he prayed for a woman who had died in the state of delivery. He stood in front of her waist.
[2108]
This hadith has been narrated by Husain with the same chain of transmitters, but no mention is made of Umm Ka'b.
[2109]
Samura b. Jundub said: I was a young boy during the time of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) and I retained in my mind (what I learnt from him), and nothing restrained me from speaking except the fact that there were persons far more advanced in age than I. Verily, I said prayer behind the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) over a woman who had died in the state of delivery, and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up to say prayer in front of the middle part of her body. And in the tradition narrated on the authority of Ibn Muthanna the words are: "(The Holy Prophet) stood in the middle part of her body for offering prayer for her."
[2110]
It is reported on the authority of Jabir ibn Samura that an unsaddled horse was brought to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) and he rode on it when he returned after having offered the funeral prayer of Ibn Dahdah and we walked on foot around him.
[2111]
Jabir ibn Samura reported that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said (funeral) prayer on Ibn Dahdah: then an unsaddled horse was brought to him and a person hobbled it, and he (the Messenger of Allah) rode upon it and it bounded and we followed it and ran after it. One of the people said that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) remarked: How many among hanging bunches in the Paradise are meant for Ibn Dahdah ?
[2112]
'Amir b. Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas told that Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas said during his illness of which he died: "Make a niche for me in the side of the grave and set up bricks over me as was done in case of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[2113]
Ibn 'Abbas said that a piece of red stuff was put in the grave of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[2114]
Thumama b. Shafayy reported: When we were with Fadala b. 'Ubaid in the country of the Romans at a place (known as) Rudis, a friend of ours died. Fadala b. 'Ubaid ordered to prepare a grave for him and then it was levelled; and then he said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanding (us) to level the grave.
[2115]
Abu'l-Hayyaj al-Asadi told that 'Ali (b. Abu Talib) said to him: Should I not send you on the same mission as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent me? Do not leave an image without obliterating it, or a high grave without levelling It. This hadith has been reported by Habib with the same chain of transmitters and he said: (Do not leave) a picture without obliterating it.
[2116]
Jabir said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade that the graves should be plastered or they be used as sitting places (for the people), or a building should be built over them.
[2117]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of Jabir b. 'Abdullah.
[2118]
Jabir said that he was forbidden to build pucca graves.
[2119]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is better that one of you should sit on live coats which would burn his clothing and come in contact with his skin than that he should sit on a grave.
[2120]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Suhail with the same chain of transmitters.
[2121]
Abu Marthad al-Ghanawi reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)as saying: Do not sit on the graves and do not pray facing towards them.
[2122]
Abu Marthad al-Ghanawi reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not pray facing towards the graves, and do not sit on them.
[2123]
'Abbad b. 'Abdullah b. Zubair reported that 'A'isha ordered the bier of Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas to be brought into the mosque so that she should pray for him. The people disapproved this (act) of hers. She said: How soon the people have forgotten that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) offered not the funeral prayer of Suhail b al-Baida' but in a mosque.
[2124]
'Abbad b. 'Abdullah b. Zubair reported on the authority of 'A'isha that when Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas died, the wives of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent message to bring his bier into the mosque so that they should offer prayer for him. They (the participants of the funeral) did accordingly, and it was placed in front of their apartments and they offered prayer for him. It was brought out of the door (known as) Bab al-Jana'iz which was towards the side of Maqa'id, and the news reached them (the wives of the Holy Prophet) that the people bad criticised this (i.e. offering of funeral prayer in the mosque) saying that it was not desirable to take the bier inside the mosque. This was conveyed to 'A'isha. She said: How hastily the people criticise that about which they know little. They criticise us for carrying the bier in the mosque. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) offered not the funeral prayer of Suhail b. Baida' but in the innermost part of the mosque.
[2125]
Abu Salama b. 'Abd al-Rahman reported on the authority ot 'A'isha that when Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas died she said: Bring it (the bier) into the mosque so that I offer prayer for him. But, this act of hers was disapproved. She said: By Allah, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) offered prayer in the mosque for the two sons of Baida', viz, for Suhail and his brother.
[2126]
'A'isha reported (that whenever it was her turn for Allah's Messenger [may peace be upon him] to spend the night with her) he would go out towards the end of the night to al-Baqi' and say: Peace be upon you, abode of a people who are believers. What you were promised would come to you tomorrow, you receiving it after some delay; and God willing we shall join you. O Allah, grant forgiveness to the inhabitants of Baqi' al-Gharqad. Qutaiba did not mention his words: "would come to you".
[2127]
Muhammad b. Qais said (to the people): Should I not narrate to you (a hadith of the Holy Prophet) on my authority and on the authority of my mother? We thought that he meant the mother who had given him birth. He (Muhammad b. Qais) then reported that it was 'A'isha who had narrated this: Should I not narrate to you about myself and about the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)? We said: Yes. She said: When it was my turn for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to spend the night with me, he turned his side, put on his mantle and took off his shoes and placed them near his feet, and spread the corner of his shawl on his bed and then lay down till he thought that I had gone to sleep. He took hold of his mantle slowly and put on the shoes slowly, and opened the door and went out and then closed it lightly. I covered my head, put on my veil and tightened my waist wrapper, and then went out following his steps till he reached Baqi'. He stood there and he stood for a long time. He then lifted his hands three times, and then returned and I also returned. He hastened his steps and I also hastened my steps. He ran and I too ran. He came (to the house) and I also came (to the house). I, however, preceded him and I entered (the house), and as I lay down in the bed, he (the Holy Prophet) entered the (house), and said: Why is it, O 'A'isha, that you are out of breath? I said: There is nothing. He said: Tell me or the Subtle and the Aware would inform me. I said: Messenger of Allah, may my father and mother be ransom for you, and then I told him (the whole story). He said: Was it the darkness (of your shadow) that I saw in front of me? I said: Yes. He struck me on the chest which caused me pain, and then said: Did you think that Allah and His Apostle would deal unjustly with you? She said: Whatsoever the people conceal, Allah will know it. He said: Gabriel came to me when you saw me. He called me and he concealed it from you. I responded to his call, but I too concealed it from you (for he did not come to you), as you were not fully dressed. I thought that you had gone to sleep, and I did not like to awaken you, fearing that you may be frightened. He (Gabriel) said: Your Lord has commanded you to go to the inhabitants of Baqi' (to those lying in the graves) and beg pardon for them. I said: Messenger of Allah, how should I pray for them (How should I beg forgiveness for them) ? He said: Say, Peace be upon the inhabitants of this city (graveyard) from among the Believers and the Muslims, and may Allah have mercy on those who have gone ahead of us, and those who come later on, and we shall, God willing, join you.
[2128]
Sulaiman b. Buraida narrated on the authority of his father that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to teach them when they went out to the graveyard. One of the narrators used to say this in the narration transmitted on the authority of Abu Bakr: "Peace be upon the inhabitants of the city (i.e. graveyard)." In the hadith transmitted by Zuhair (the words are): "Peace be upon you, the inhabitants of the city, among the believers, and Muslims, and God willing we shall join you. I beg of Allah peace for us and for you."
[2129]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger, (may peace be upon him) as saying: I sought permission to beg forgiveness for my mother, but He did not grant it to me. I sought permission from Him to visit her grave, and He granted it (permission) to me.
[2130]
Abu Huraira reported: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) visited the grave of his mother and he wept, and moved others around him to tears, and said: I sought permission from my Lord to beg forgiveness for her but it was not granted to me, and I sought permission to visit her grave and it was granted to motel So visit the graves, for that makes you mindful of death.
[2131]
Ibn Buraida reported on the authority of his father that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: I forbade you to visit graves, but you may now visit them; I forbade you to eat the flesh of sacrificial animals after three days, but you way now keep it as along as you feel inclined; and I forbade you nabidh except in a water-skin, you may drink it from all kinds of water-skins, but you must not drink anything intoxicating.
[2132]
This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters.
[2133]
Jabir b. Samura reported: (The dead body) of a person who had killed himself with a broad-headed arrow was brought before the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), but he did not offer prayers for him.
[2134]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: No sadaqa (zakat) is payable on less than five wasqs of (dates or grains), on less than five camel-heads and on less than five uqiyas (of silver).
[2135]
A hadith like this has been narrated by 'Amr b. Yahya with the same chain of transmitters.
[2136]
'Umara reported: I heard Abd Sa'id al-Khudri as saying that he had heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) make (this) observation with a gesture of his five fingers, and then he narrated the hadith as transmitted by 'Uyaina (hadith 2134).
[2137]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Sadaqa (zakat) is payable on less than five wasqs of (dates or grains), on less than five camel-heads, and on less than five uqiyas (of silver).
[2138]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No Sadaqa is payable on less than five wasqs of dates or grains.
[2139]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No Sadaqa is payable on the grains and dates till it (comes to the Weight) of five wasqs, or less than five heads of camels, or less than five uqiyas (of silver).
[2140]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Isma'il b. Umayya with the same chain of transmitters.
[2141]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Isma'il b. Umayya with the same chain of transmitters, but instead of the word dates, fruit has been used.
[2142]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No Sadaqa is payable on less than five fiqiyas of silver, and on less than five heads of camels, and less than five wasqs of dates.
[2143]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A tenth is payable on what is watered by rivers, or rains, and a twentieth on what is watered by camels.
[2144]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messsenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No Sadaqa is due from a Muslim on his slave or horse.
[2145]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No Sadaqa is due from a Muslim on his slave or horse.
[2146]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters.
[2147]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is no Sadaqa on a slave except Sadaqat-ul-Fitr.
[2148]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)sent Umar for (collecting) Sadaqa (zakat), and it was said that Ibn Jamil, Khalid b. Walid and 'Abbas the uncle of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), refused (to pay it). Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Ibn Jamil is taking revenge but for this that he was destitute and Allah made him rich. As regards Khalid, you are unjust to Khalid, for be reserved his armours and weapons for the sake of Allah, and as for 'Abbas, I shall be responsible for it and an equal amount along with it. And he again said: 'Umar, bear this in mind, the uncle of a person is like his father.
[2149]
Ibn Umar said that Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) prescribed the payment of Zakat-ul-Fitr (on breaking the fast) of Ramadan for people, for every freeman, or slave, male and female among the Muslims-one sa' of dried dates, or one sa' of barley.
[2150]
Ibn 'Umar said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prescribed Zakat-ul-Fitr one sa' of dates or one sa' of barley for every slave or freeman, young or old.
[2151]
Ibn 'Umar said that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) prescribed the Sadaqa of Ramadan (Sadaqat-al-Fitr) one sa' of dates or one sa' of barley for every free man or a slave, male or female, and then the people equalised (one sa' of dates or barley) with half a sa' of wheat.
[2152]
Abdullah b. Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) ordered the (payment of) Zakat-ul-Fitr one sa' of dates, or one sa' of barley. Ibn 'Umar ('Abdullah b. 'Umar) further said: The people equalised it (then) with two mudds of fine wheat.
[2153]
Ibn Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) prescribed Zakat-ul-Fitr of Ramadan one sa' of dates or one sa' of barley for every individual among the Muslims (whether) free man or slave, male or female, young or old.
[2154]
Sad b. Abu Sarh heard Abu Sa'id al-Khudri as saying: We used to take out as the Zakat of Fitr one sa' of grain, or one sa' of barley or one sa' of dates, or one sa' of cheese or one sa' of raisins.
[2155]
Abd Sa'id al-Khudri reported: We, on behalf of every young or old, free man or slave (amongst us), used to take out during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as the Zakat of Fitr one sa' of grain, or one sa' of cheese or one sa' of raisins. And we continued taking out these till Mu'awiya b. Abu Sufyan came to us for pilgrimage or 'Umra, and addressed the people on the pulpit and said to them: I see that two mudds of zakat out of the wheat (red) of Syria is equal to one sa' of dates. So the people accepted it. But Abu Sa'id said: I would continue to take out as I used to take out (before, i e. one sa') as long as I live.
[2156]
Sa'd b. Abu Sarh heard Abu Sa'id al-Khudri as saying: We, on behalf of young or old, free or slave, used to take out the Zakat of Fitr while the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) was among us, in three kinds, one sa' of dates, one sa' of cheese, or one sa' of barley, and we continued to take that out till the time of Mu'awiya, for he saw that two mudds of wheat were equal to one sa' of dates . Abu Sa'id sald: I would continue to take that out as before (i e. one sa' of wheat).
[2157]
Abu Sa'id al Khudri reported: We used to take out the Zakat of Fitr in three kinds, cheese, dates and barley.
[2158]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported that when Mu'awiya prescribed half a sa' of wheat equal to one sa' of dates, he (Abu Sa'id al-Khudri) objected to it, and said: I would take out (Sadaqat-ul-Fitr) but that which I used to bring forth during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) one sa' of dates, or one sa' of raisins, or one sa' of barley, or one sa' of cheese.
[2159]
Ibn 'Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) ordered that the Sadaqat-ul-Fitr should be paid before the people go out for prayer.
[2160]
Abdullah b 'Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) ordered the payment of Sadaqat-ul-Fitr before people go out for prayer.
[2161]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: If any owner of gold or silver does not pay what is due on him, when the Day of Resurrection would come, plates of fire would be beaten out for him; these would then be heated in the fire of Hell and his sides, his forehead and his back would be cauterized with them. Whenever these cool down, (the process is) repeated during a day the extent of which would be fifty thousand years, until judgment is pronounced among servants, and he sees whether his path is to take him to Paradise or to Hell. It was said: Messenger of Allah, what about the camel? He (the Holy Prophet) said: If any owner of the camel does not pay what is due on him, and of his due in that (camel) is (also) to milk it on the day when it comes down to water. When the Day of Resurrection comes a soft sandy plain would be set for him, as extensive as possible, (he will find) that not a single young one is missing, and they will trample him with their hoofs and bite him with their mouths. As often as the first of them passes him, the last of them would be made to return during a day the extent of which would be fifty thousand years, until judgment is pronounced among servants and he sees whether his path is to take him to Paradise or to Hell. It was (again) said: Messenger of Allah, what about cows (cattle) and sheep? He said: It any owner of the cattle and sheep does not pay what is due on them, when the Day of Resurrection comes a soft sandy plain would be spread for them, he will find none of them missing, with twisted horns, without horns or with a broken horn, and they will gore him with their horns and trample him with their hoofs. As often as the first of them passes him the last of them would be made to return to him during a day the extent of which would be fifty thousand years, until judgment would be pronounced among the servants. And he would be shown his path-path leading him to Paradise or to Hell. It was said: Messenger of Allah, what about the horse? Upon this he said: The horses are of three types. To one than (these are) a burden, and to another man (these are) a covering, and still to another man (these are) a source of reward. The one for whom these are a burden is the person who rears them in order to show off, for vainglory and for opposing the Muslims; so they are a burden for him. The one for whom these are a covering is the person who rears them for the sake of Allah but does not forget the right of Allah concerning their backs and their necks, and so they are a covering for him. As for those which bring reward (these refer to) the person who rears them for the sake of Allah to be used for Muslims and he puts them in meadow and field. And whatever thing do these eat from that meadow and field would be recorded on his behalf as good deeds, as would also the amount of their dung and urine. And these would not break their halter and prance a course or two without having got recorded the amount of their hoof marks and their dung as a good deed on his behalf (on behalf of their owner). And their master does not bring them past a river from which they drink, though he did not intend to quench their thirst, but Allah would record for him the amount of what they drink on his behalf as deeds. It was said: Messenger of Allah, what about the asses?, Upon this he said: Nothing has been revealed to me in regard to the asses (in particular) except this one verse of a comprehensive nature: "He who does an atom's weight of good will see it, and he who does an atom's weight of evil will see it" (xcix. 7)
[2162]
This hadith has been narrated by Zaid b. Aslam with the same chain of transmitters except that he said: "None among the owners of camels who does not pay their due," but did not say "their due (Zakat) out of them." and he make a mention: "He did not miss a single young one out of them." and he said: "Their sides. their foreheads and their backs would be cauterised."
[2163]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No owner of the treasure who does not pay Zakat (would be spared) but (his hoards) would be heated in the Fire of Hell and these would be made into plates and with these his sides, his forehead would be cauterised till Allah would pronounce judgment among His servants during a day, the extent of which would be fifty thousand years. He would then see his path, leading either to Paradise or to Hell. And no owner of the camels who does not pay Zakat (would be spared) but a soft sandy plain would be set for him and they (the camels) would be made to pass over him till the last of them would be made to return till Allah would pronounce judgment among His servants during a day the extent of which would be fifty thousand years. He would then see his path leading him to Paradise or leading him to Hell. And no owner of the (cattle and) goats who does not pay Zakat (would be spared) but a soft sandy plain would be set for him, he would find none of them missing, with twisted horns, without horns, or with broken horns, and they will gore him with their horns and trample him with their hoofs and they would be made to pass over him till the last of them would be made to return till Allah would pronounce judgment among His servants, during a day the extent of which would be fdty thousand years, and he would see the paths leading to Paradise or to Hell. Suhail said: I do not know whether he made mention of the cows. They said: Messenger of Allah(may peace be upon him), what about the horses? He said: The horses have goodness in their foreheads (or he said) or goodness is ingrained in the foreheads of the horses (Suhail said: I am in doubt as to what was actually said) up till the Day of judgement. The horses are of three kinds. They are a source of reward to a person, they are a covering to a person, and they are a burden to a person. As for those which bring reward is that a person would get reward who rears them for the sake of Allah and trains them for Him, and nothing disappears in their stomachs but Allah would record for him a good deed. And if they were to graze in the meadow, they would eat nothing but Allah would record for him a reward. And if they were to drink water from the canal, with every drop that, would disappear in their stomachs there would be reward (for the owner). He went on describing till a reward was mentioned for their urine and dung. And if they pranced a course or two, there would be recorded a reward for every pace that they covered. As for one for whom they are a covering, he is the man who rears them for honour and dignity but does not forget the right of their backs and their stomachs, in plenty and adversity, As regards one for whom they are a burden, he is that who rears them for vainglory and showing off to the people; for him they are, the burden. They said: Messenger of Allah, what about asses? He said: Allah has not revealed to me anything in regards to it except this one comprehensive verse : "He who does an atom's weight of good will see it, and he who does an atom's weight of evil will see it" (xcix. 7).
[2164]
This hadith has been narrated by Suhail b. Abu Salih with the same chain of transmitters, and he said he substituted the word aqsa' with 'adba' and said: "his side and his back," but he made no mention of his forehead.
[2165]
This hadith has been narrated by Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: "When a person does not pay what is due to Allah or Sadaqa of his camels. . . . " The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2166]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah al-Ansari reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The owner of a camel who does not pay what is due on it (would be punished in this way) that on the Day of Resurrection many more (along with his camel) would come and the owner would be made to sit on a soft sandy ground and they would trample him with their feet and hooves. And no owner of the cattle who does not pay what is due on them (would be spared the punishment) but on the Day of Resurrection, many more would come and he (the owner) would be made to sit on the soft sandy ground and would be gored by their horns and trampled under their feet. And no owner of the goats and sheep who does not pay what is due on them (would be spared of punishment) but many more would come on the Day of Resurrection and he (the owner) would be made to sit on a soft sandy ground and they would gore him with their horns and trample him under their hooves. And there would be more (among this flock of sheep and goat) without horns or with broken horns. And no owner of the treasure who does not pay its due but his treasure would come on the Day of Resurrection like a bald snake and would pursue him with its mouth open, and when it would come near he would run away from it, and he would be called thus: "Take your treasure which you concealed, for I do not need it." When he would find no way out he would put his hand in its mouth and it would gnaw it like a he-camel. Abu Zubair said: We heard Ubaid b. Umair saying this. We then asked Jabir b. 'Abdullah about this. And he also said like Ubaid b. Umair, Abu Zubair said: I heard 'Ubaid b. 'Umair saying: A man said: Messenger of Allah, what is due on camels? He said: Milking them near water, and lending of bucket (used for drawing water from it), or lending its male for mating with a she-camel and providing it as a ride for the sake of Allah.
[2167]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: No owner of camels or cattle or flock of sheep or goats who does not pay his due (would be spared punishment) but would be made to sit on the Day of Resurrection on a soft sandy ground and the hoofed animals would trample him with their hoofs and gore him with their horns. And none of them on that day would be without horns, or with broken horns. We said: Messenger of.Allab, but what is due on them? He said: Lending of the male (for use) and lending of the bucket (used for drawing water for them) and for mating and milking them near water and providing them as a ride for the sake of Allah. And no owner of the property who does not pay Zakat (would be spared punishment) but it (his property) would turn into a bald snake and would follow its owner wherever he would go, and he would run away from it, and it would be said to him: That is your property about which you were stingy. And when he would find no other way out he would thrust his hand in its mouth and it would gnaw it like a male camel.
[2168]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: There came people from among the Bedouins to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Collectors of Sadaqa come to us and treat us unjustly. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Please your collectors. Jarir said: Ever since I heard it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) no collector had departed but was pleased with me.
[2169]
This hadith has been narrated by Muhammad b. Isma'il with the same chain of transmitters.
[2170]
Abu Dharr reported: I went to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he was sitting under the shade of the Ka'ba. As he saw me he said: By the Lord of the Ka'ba, they are the losers. I came there till I sat and I could not stay (longer) and (then) stood up. I said: Messenger of Allah, let my father, be ransom for you, who are they (the losers)? He said: They are those having a huge amount of wealth except so and so and (those who spend their wealth generously on them whom they find in front of them, behind them and on their right side and on their left side) and they are a few. And no owner of camels, or cattle or goat and sheep, who does not pay Zakat (would be spared punishment) but these (camels, cattle, goats and sheep) would come on the Day of Resurrection wearing more flesh and would gore him with their horns and trample them with their hooves. And when the last one would pass away, the first one would return (to trample him) till judgment would be pronounced among people.
[2171]
Abu Dbarr reported: I went to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he was sitting under the shade of the Ka'ba, and the rest of the hadith it the same but for this that he (the Holy Prophet) said: "By Allah, in Whose hand is my life, no person on earth who dies and leaves behind camels, or cattle or goat and sheep, and does not pay Zakat (would be spared the punishment)."
[2172]
Abu Huraira reported that the Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: Nothing is more delighting to me than this that Uhud should be of gold for me, and no dinar is left with me out of it before three nights pass except a dinar which I would set aside for the repayment of debt upon me.
[2173]
Abu Huraira reported the same from the Prophet (may peace be upon him).
[2174]
Abu Dharr reported: I walked with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the stony ground of Medina in the afternoon and we were looking at Uhud. The Messenger of Allah (way peace by upon him) said : Abu Dharr ! I said: Messenger of Allah, I am here at thy beck and call. He said: What I desire is that Uhud be gold with me and three nights should pass and there is left with me any dinar but one coin which I would keep to pay debt. (I love) to spend it among the servants of Allah like this and he pointed in front of him, and on his right side and on his left side. We then proceeded on and he said: Abu Dharr. I said: At thy beck and call, Messenger of Allah. He (the Holy Prophet) said: The rich would be poor on the Day of Resurrection, but he who spent like this and like this and like this, and he pointed as at the first time. We again went on when he said. Abu Dharr, stay where you are till I come back to you. He (the Holy Prophet) then moved on till he disappeared from my sight He (Abu Dharr) said: I heard a sound and I heard a noise. I said (to myself): The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) might have met (mishap or an enemy). I wished to follow him but I remembered his command for not departing till he would come back. So I waited for him, and when he came I made a mention of what I heard. He said: it was Gabriel, who came to me and said: "He who dies among your Ummah without associating Anything with Allah would enter Paradise. I said: Even if he committed fornication or theft? He said: Even if he committed fornication or theft.
[2175]
Abu Dharr reported: I went out one night (and found) the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) walking all alone. There was no man with him. I thought that he did not like anyone walking along with him. So I began to walk in the light of the moon. He, however turned his attention to me and saw me and said: Who is this? I said: It is Abu Dharr. Let Allah make me as ransom for you. He said: Abu Dharr, come on. He (Abu Dharr) said: So I walked along with him for some time and he said: The wealthy persons would have little (reward) on the Day of Resurrection, except upon whom Allah conferred goodness (wealth). He dispensed it to his right, left, in front of him and at his back (just as the wind diffuses fragrance) and did good with it (riches). I went along with him for some time when He said: Sit here. And he made me sit at a safe place and there were stones around it, and he said to me: Sit here till I come to you. He went away on the stony ground till I could not see him. He stayed away from me, and he prolonged his stay. Then I heard him as he came back and he was saying: Even if he committed theft and even if he committed fornication. When he came I could not help asking him: Apostle of Allah, let Allah make me ransom for you, whom were you speaking on the stony ground? I heard nobody responding to you. He (the Holy Prophet) said: It was Gabriel who met me by the side of the stony ground and said: Give glad tidings to your Ummah that he who died without associating ought with Allah would go into Paradise. I said: Gabriel, even if he committed theft and fornication ? He said : Yes. I said : Even it he committed theft and fornication? He said: Yes, I again said: Even if he committed theft and fornication? He said: Yes, even if he drank wine.
[2176]
Ahnaf b. Qais reported : I came to Medina and when I was in the company of the grandees of Quraish a man with a crude body and an uncouth face wearing coarse clothes came there. He stood up before them and said: Give glad tidings to those whom who amass riches of the stones which would be heated in the Fire of Hell, and would be placed at the tick of the chest till it would project from the shoulder bone and would he put on the shoulder bone till it would project from the tick of his chest, and it (this stone) would continue passing and repassing (from one side to the other). He (the narrator) said: Then people hung their heads and I saw none among them giving any answer. He then returned and I followed him till he sat near a pillar. I said: I find that these (people) disliked what you said to them and they do not understand anything. My friend Abu'l-Qasim (Muhammad) (may peace he upon him) called me and I responded to him, and he said: Do you see Uhud? I saw the sun (shining) on me and I thought that he would send me on an errand for him. So I said: I see it. Upon this he said: Nothing would delight me more than this that I should have gold like it (equal to the bulk of Uhud), and I should spend it all except three dinars. (How sad it is) that they hoard worldly riches, and they know nothing. I said: What about you and your brothers Quraish? You do not go to thein for any need and do not accept anything from them. He said: By Allah, I neither beg anything from them (from worldly goods), nor do I ask them anything about religion till I meet my Allah and His Messenger.
[2177]
Ahnaf b. Qais reported: While I was in the company of the (elites) of Quraiah, Abu Dharr came there and he was saying: Give glad tidings to the hoarders of riches that their backs would be branded (so deeply) that (the hot Iron) would come out of their sides, and when the backs of their necks would be branded, it would come out of their foreheads. He (Abu Dharr) then went away and sat down. I asked who he was. They said: He is Abu Dharr. I went to him and said to him: What is this that I heard from you which you were saying before? He said : I said nothing but only that which I heard from their Prophet (may peace be upon him). I again said: What do you say about this gift? He said: Take it, for today it is a help. But when it becomes a price for your religion, then abandon it.
[2178]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that Allah, the Most Blessed and High, said: O son of Adam, spend. I will spend on you. The right hand of Allah is full and overflowing and in nothing would diminish it, by overspending day and night.
[2179]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that Allah said to him: "Spend, I will bestow upon you." And the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The right hand of Allah is full and spending (the riches) liberally during day and night will not diminish (the resources of Allah). Don't you see what (an enormous amount of resources) He has spent since He created the heaven and the earth, and what is in His right hand has not decreased? His Throne is upon the water. And in His other hand is death, and He elevates and degrades (whom He likes).
[2180]
Thauban reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The most excellent dinar is one that a person spends on his family, and the dinar which he spends on his animal in Allah's path, and the dinar he spends on his companions in Allah's path. Abu Qilaba (one of the narrators) said: He (the narrator) started with family, and then Abu Qilaba said: Who is the person with greater reward than a person who spends on young members of his family (and thus) preserves (saves them from want) (and by virtue of which) Allah brings profit for them and makes them rich.
[2181]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Of the dinar you spend as a contribution in Allah's path, or to set free a slave, or as a sadaqa given to a needy, or to support your family, the one yielding the greatest reward is that which you spent on your family.
[2182]
Khaithama reported: While we were sitting in the company of 'Abdullah b. 'Umar there came in his steward. He (Ibn 'Umar) said: Have you supplied the provision to the slaves? He said: No. Upon this he said: Go and give (the provision) to them, for the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) has said: This sin is enough for a man that he withholds the subsistence from one whose master he is.
[2183]
Jabir reported: A person from the Banu 'Udhra set a slave free after his death. This news reached the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon hhn).Upon this he said: Have you any property besides it? He said: No. Upon this he said: Who would buy (this slave) from me? Nulaim b. Abdullah bought it for eight hundred dirhams and (this amount was) brought to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) who returned it to him (the owner), and then said: Start with your own self and spend it on yourself, and if anything is left, it should be spent on your family, and if anything is left (after meeting the needs of the family) it should be spent on relatives, and if anything is left from the family, it should be spent like this, like this. And he was saying: In front of you, on your right and on your left.
[2184]
Jabir reported that a person among the Ansar who was called Abu Madhkur granted posthumous freedom to his slave who was called Ya'qub. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2185]
Anas b. Malik is reported as saying: Abu Talha was the one among the Ansar of Medina who possessed the largest property and among his property he valued most was his garden known as Bairaha' which was opposite the mosque, and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) often visited it and he drank of its sweet water. When this verse was revealed: "You will never attain righteousness till you give freely of what you Have" (iii. 91), Abu Talha got up and, going to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), said: Allah says in His Book: "You will never attain righteousness till you give freely of what you love," and the dearest of my property is Bairaha' so I give it as Sadaqa to God from Whom I hope for reward for it and the treasure with Allah; so spend it, Messenger of Allah, on whatever purpose you deem it proper. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Bravo I that is profit earning property. I have heard what you have said, but I think you should spend it on your nearest relatives. So Abu Talha distributed it among the neatest relatives and his cousins on his father's side.
[2186]
Anas reported that when this verse was tevealed: "You will not attain righteousness till you give freely of what you love," Abu Talha said: I see that our Lord has demanded from us out of our property; so I make you a witness, Messenger of Allah. that I give my land known as Bairaha' for the sake of Allah. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Give that to your relatives. So he gave it to Hassan b. Thabit and Ubayy b. Ka'b.
[2187]
Maimuna bint Harith reported that she set free a slave-girl during the lifetime of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and she made a mention of that to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he said: Had you gives her to your maternal uncles, you would have a greater reward.
[2188]
Zainab, the wife of 'Abdullah(b. Mas'ud ), reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: 0 women, give sadaqa even though it be some of your jewellery. She returned to 'Abdullah and said: You are a person with empty hands, whereas the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) has commanded us to give sadaqa, so better go to him and ask and if this will suffice for me; otherwise I shall give it to someone else. 'Abdullah said to me (his wife): You better go yourself. So I went and there was another woman of the Ansar at the door of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) having the same porpose as I had. Now Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was invested with awe (so we did not like to knock). Then Bilal came out and we said to him: Go to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and inform him that there are two women at the door asking him whether it will serve them to give sadaqa to their spouses and to orphans who are under their charge, but do not inform him who we are. Bilal went to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and asked him (what these women had instructed him to ask). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) asked him who these women were. He (Bilal) said: They are women from Ansar and Zainab. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Which of the Zainabs? He said: The wife of 'Abdullah. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: There are two rewards for them, the reward of kinship and the reward of Sadaqa.
[2189]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Zainab the wife of 'Abdullah, and she said: I was in the mosque and the Prophet of Allah (may peace be upon him) saw me and said: Give Sadaqa even though it is out of your jewellery. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2190]
Umm Salama said: I asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) whether there is a reward for me if I spend oh Abu Salama's sons, and I am not going to abandon them in this state (of helplessness) for they are my sons. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Yes. For you is the reward for what you spend on them.
[2191]
This hadith has been narrated by Ibn 'Urwa with the same chain of transmitters.
[2192]
Abu Mas'ud reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: When a Muslim spends on his family seeking reward for it from Allah, it counts for him as sadaqa.
[2193]
This hadith has been narrated by Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[2194]
Asma' daughter of Abu Bakr reported: I said: Messenger of Allah, my mother, who is inclined or scared has come to me. Should I (even An her position of being opposed to Islam) treat her well? He said: Yes.
[2195]
Asma' bint Abu Bakr reported: My mother who was a polytheist came to me when he (the Holy Prophet) entered into treaty with, the Quraish (of Mecca). I inquired from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying: Messenger of Allah, there has come to me my mother and she is inclined; should I (in this state of her mind) show her kindness? He said: Yes, treat her kindly.
[2196]
'A'isha said that a person came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: My mother died suddenly without having made any will. I think she would have definitely given Sadaqa if she had been able to speak. Would she have a reward if I gave Sadaqa on her behalf? He (the Holy Prophet) said:Yes. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters. And in the hadith transmitted by Abu Usama the words are: "She did not make any will," as it has been reported by Ibn Bishr, but it was not reported by the rest of the narrators.
[2197]
Hudhaifa and Abu Shaiba reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Every act of goodness is sadaqa.
[2198]
Abu Dharr reported: some of the people from among the Companions of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to him: Messenger of Allah, the rich have taken away (air the) reward. They observe prayer as we do; they keep the fasts as we keep, and tray give Sadaqa out of their surplus riches. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: Has Allah not prescribed for you (a course) by following which you can (also) do sadaqa? In every declaration of the glorification of Allah (i.e. saying Subhan Allah) there is a Sadaqa, and every Takbir (i.e. saying Allah-O-Akbar) is a sadaqa, and every praise of His (saying al-Hamdu Lillah) is a Sadaqa and every declaration that He is One (La illha ill-Allah) is a sadaqa, and enjoining of good is a sadaqa, and forbidding of that which is evil is a Sadaqa, and in man's sexual Intercourse (with his wife,) there is a Sadaqa. They (the Companions) said: Messenger of Allah, is there reward for him who satisfies his sexual passion among us? He said: Tell me, if he were to devote it to something forbidden, would it not be a sin on his part? Similarly, if he were to devote it to something lawful, he should have a reward.
[2199]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Every one of the children of Adam has been created with three hundred and sixty joints; so he who declares the Glory of Allah, praises Allah, declares Allah to be One, Glorifies Allah, and seeks forgiveness from Allah, and removes stone, or thorn, or bone from people's path, and enjoins what is good and forbids from evil, to the number of those three hundred and sixty-four, will walk that day haviing removed himself from Hell.
[2200]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zaid with the same chain of transmitters except with (a slight) change of words (i.e. he [the Holy Prophet]) said: Or he enjoined what is good,. . . and said: He enters the evening [ie. he walks till eveningl.
[2201]
This hadith has been narrated by 'A'isha through anothr chain of transmitters in which she reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be ulon him) as saying: "Every man is created"; the rest of the hadith is the same and he said: "He walks on that day."
[2202]
Sa'id b. Abu Burda reported on the authority of his grandfather that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Giving of Sadaqa is essential for every Muslim. It was said (to him): What do you say of him who does not find (the means) to do so? He said: Let him work with both his hands, thus doing benefit to himself and give Sadaqa. It was said to him: What about him who does not have (the means) to do so? He said: Then let him assist the needy, the aggrieved. It was said: What do you say of one who cannot even do this? He said: Then he should enjoin what is reputable or what is good. He said: What about him if he cannot do that? He (the Holy Prophet) said: He should then abstain from evil, for verify that is Sadaqa on his behalf.
[2203]
This hadith has been narrated by Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[2204]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported that-this is out of (those ahadith) which Abu Huraira narrated to us from Muhammad, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). And he while making a mention of ahadith reported from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said this: Sadaqa is due on every joint of a person, every day the sun rises. Administering of justice between two men is also a Sadaqa. And assisting a man to ride upon his beast, or helping him load his luggage upon it, is a Sadaqa; and a good word is a Sadaqa; and every step that you take towards prayer is a Sadaqa, and removing of harmful things from the pathway is a Sadaqa.
[2205]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is never a day wherein servants (of God) get up at morn, but are not visited by two angels. One of them says: 0 Allah, give him more who spends (for the sake of Allah), and the other says: 0 Allah, bring destruction to one who withholds.
[2206]
Haritha b. Wahb reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Give Sadaqa for a time is about to come when a person would walk with alms and the one whom it is to be given would say: Had you brought it yesterday, I would have accepted it. For the present I do not need it. (And the giver of Sadaqa) I would not find anyone to accept it.
[2207]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would come a time for the people when a person would roam about with Sadaqa of gold, but he would find no one to accept it from him. And a man would be seen followed by forty women seeking refuge with him on account of the scarcity of males and abundance of females."
[2208]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour will not come before wealth becomes abundant and overflowing, so much so that a man takes Zakat out of his property and cannot find anyone to accept it from him and till the land of Arabia becomes meadows and rivers.
[2209]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Last Hour will not come till wealth is abundant and overflowing, so much so that the owner of the property will think as to who will accept Sadaqa from him, and a person would be called to accept Sadaqa and he would say: I do not need it.
[2210]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenaer (may peace be upon him) as saying: The earth will vomit long pieces of its liver like columns of gold and silver, and the murderer will come and say: It was for this that I committed murder. The breaker of family ties will come and say: It was for this that I broke the family ties; and the thief will come and say: It is for this that my hands were cut off. They will then leave it and will not take anything out of it.
[2211]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (tray peace be upon him) as saying: If anyone gives as Sadaqa the equivalent of a date from that (earning) earned honestly, for Allah accepts that which is lawful, the Lord would accept it with His Right Hand, and even if it is a date, it would foster in the Hand of the lord, as one of you fosters his colt, till it becomes bigger than a mountain.
[2212]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No one gives Sadaqa of a date out of his honest earning, but Allah accepts it with His Right Hand, and then fosters it as one of you fosters the colt or a young she-camel, till it becomes like a mountain or even greater.
[2213]
This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters with a change of words. In the hadith transmitted Rauh (the words are): "Out of the honest earning and its spending at what is its (due) right"; and in the hadith transmitted by Sulaiman (the words are): "And its spending at its proper place."
[2214]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: 0 people, Allah is Good and He therefore, accepts only that which is good. And Allah commanded the believers as He commanded the Messengers by saying: "O Messengers, eat of the good things, and do good deeds; verily I am aware of what you do" (xxiii. 51). And He said: ' 0 those who believe, eat of the good things that We gave you" (ii. 172) He then made a mention of a person who travels widely, his hair dishevelled and covered with dust. He lifts his hand towards the sky (and thus makes the supplication): "O Lord, 0 Lord," whereas his diet is unlawful, his drink is unlawful, and his clothes are unlawful and his nourishment is unlawful. How can then his supplication be accepted ?
[2215]
'Adi b. Hatim reported that he heard Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: He who among you can protect himself against Fire, he should do so, even if it should be with half a date.
[2216]
'Adi b. Hatim reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah will speak with everyone amongst you without any interpreter between them. He (the man) would see towards his right and would not find anything but (the deeds) which he had done before, and he would see towards the left and would not find anything but (the deeds) which he had done before. He would see in front of him and would find nothing but Fire just before his face. So protect (yourselves) against Fire even if it is with the help of half a date. A hadith like this has been transmitted by Khaithama and addition has been made in this of (these words); "Even if it is with a good word."
[2217]
'Adi b. Hatim reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) made a mention of Fire. He turned his face aside and diverted his attention and then said: Guard (yourselves) against Fire. He turned his face and diverted his attention till we thought as if he were (actually seeing it and then said: Protect yourselves against Fire even if it is with half a date, and he who does not find it, (he should do so) with pleasant words. Abu Kuraib did not mention the word: (as if).
[2218]
Adi b. Hatim reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) made a mention of the Fire and sought refuge (with Allah against it). He turned aside his face three times and then said: Protect yourselves against Fire even if with half a date. But if you fail to find it (then protect yourselves against Fire) with the help of a pleasant word).
[2219]
Mundhir b. Jarir reported on the authority of his father: While we were in the company of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the early hours of the morning, some people came there (who) were barefooted, naked, wearing striped woollen clothes, or cloaks, with their swords hung (around their necks). Most of them, nay, all of them, belonged to the tribe of Mudar. The colour of the face of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) underwent a change when he saw them in poverty. He then entered (his house) and came out and commanded Bilal (to pronounce Adhan). He pronounced Adhan and Iqima, and he (the Holy Prophet) observed prayer (along with his Companion) and then addressed (them reciting verses of the Holy Qur'an): '"0 people, fear your Lord, Who created you from a single being" to the end of the verse, "Allah is ever a Watcher over you" (iv. 1). (He then recited) a verse of Sura Hashr: "Fear Allah. and let every soul consider that which it sends forth for the morrow and fear Allah" (lix. 18). (Then the audience began to vie with one another in giving charity.) Some donated a dinar, others a dirham, still others clothes, some donated a sa' of wheat, some a sa' of dates; till he (the Holy Prophet) said: (Bring) even if it is half a date. Then a person from among the Ansar came there with a money bag which his hands could scarcely lift; in fact, they could not (lift). Then the people followed continuously, till I saw two heaps of eatables and clothes, and I saw the face of the Messenger (may peace be upon him) glistening, like gold (on account of joy). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who sets a good precedent in Islam, there is a reward for him for this (act of goodness) and reward of that also who acted according to it subsequently, without any deduction from their rewards; and he who sets in Islam an evil precedent, there is upon him the burden of that, and the burden of him also who acted upon it subsequently, without any deduction from their burden.
[2220]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Mandhir through another chain of transmitters. And the hadith transmitted by Ibn Mu'adh contains an addition: "He then observed the noon prayer and then gave the sermon."
[2221]
Mundhir b. Jarir narrated on the authority of his father: When we were sitting in the company of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). There came people dressed in striped woollen clothes, and the rest of the hadith in the same, and there (it is also mentioned): "He observed the Zuhr prayer and then climbed up a small pulpit, praised Allah, lauded Him, and then said: Verily Allah in His Book has revealed: 'O people, fear your Lord,' etc." (iv. 1).
[2222]
Jarir b.'Abdullah reported :People came to to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and they ware dressed in woollen clothes. He (the Holy Prophet) saw their dismal state, as they were suffering from want and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[2223]
Abu Mas'ud reported: We were commanded to give charity (despite the fact.) that we were coolies. Abu 'Aqil donated half a sa'. And there came another man with more than this. The hypocrites said: Verily Allah does not stand in need of the charity of this, and the second one has done nothing but only made a show (of his charity). Then this verse was revealed. "Those who scoff at the voluntary givers of charity among the believers as well as those who cannot find anything (to give) but with their hard labour"(ix. 80). And Bishr did not utter the word Muttawwi'in.
[2224]
This hadith has been narrated by Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters and in the hadith transmitted by Sa'id b. al Rabi (the words are): "We used to carry loads on our backs."
[2225]
It is narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira (that the Messenger of Allah) said: Of course the person who gives to the family a she-camel as a gift, which gives milk morning and evening equal to a large bowl, its reward (the reward of the gift) is great.
[2226]
Abu Huraira reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade (to do certain things) and then he made a mention of certain habits and said: He who gives a she-camel as a gift, for him is the reward (of the gift) both morn- ing and evening-a reward for drinking milk in the morning and a reward for drinking milk in the evening.
[2227]
Abu Haraira reported that the likeness of one who spends or one who gives charity is that of a person who has two cloaks or two coats-of-mail over him right from the breast to the collar bones. And when the spender (and the other narrator said, when the giver of charity) makes up his mind to give charity, it (coat-mail) becomes expanded for him. But when a miserly person intends to spend, it contracts and every ring grips the place where it is. For the giver of charity, this coat-of. mail expands to cover his whole body and obliterates even his footprints. Abu Huraira said: (The miserly man) tries to expand it (the coat-of-mail) but it does not expand.
[2228]
Abu Haraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) gave similitudes of a miserly man and the giver of charity as two persons who have two coats-of-mail over them with their hands pressed closely to their breasts and their collar bones. Whenever the giver of charity gives charity it (the coat-of mail) expands so much as to cover his finger tips and obliterate his foot prints. And whenever the miserly person intends to give charity (the coat-of-mail) contracts and every ring grips the place where it is. He (Abu Huraira) said: I saw the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saying with fingers in the opening of his shirt: "If you had seen him trying to expand it, it will not expand."
[2229]
Abu Haraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as-saying:. The similitude of a miserly man and the giver of charity is that of two persons with coatsof mail over them; when the giver of charity intends to give charity, it expands over him (to much so) that the footprints are also obliterated. And when the miserly man intends to give charity, it contracts over him, and his hands are tied up to his collar bone, and every ring is fixed up to another. He (the narrator) said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: He would try to expand it. but he would not be able to do so.
[2230]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: A man expressed his intention to give charity, so he came out with charity and placed it in the hand of an adulteress. In the morning, the people were talking and saying: charity was given to an adulteress last night. He (the giver of Sadaqa) said: 0 Allah, to Thee be the praise-to an adulteress. He then again expressed his intention to give charity; so he went out with the charity and placed it in the hand of a rich person. In the morning the people were talking and saying: Charity was given to a rich person. He (the giver of charity) said: 0 Allah, to Thee be the praise-to a well-to-do person. He then expressed his intention to give charity, so he went out with charity and placed it in the hand of a thief. In the morning, the people were talking and saying: Charity was given to a thief. So (one of the persons) said: 0 Allah, to Thee be the praise (what a misfortune it is that charity has been given to) the adulteress, to a rich person. to a thief! There came (the angel to him) and he was told: Your charity has been accepted. As for the adulteress (the charity might become the means) whereby she might restrain herself from fornication. The rich man might perhaps learn a lesson and spend from what Allah has given him, and the thief might thereby refrain from committing theft.
[2231]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The honest Muslim trustee who spends (sometimes he said "who gives") what he is commanded to do and he gives that in full with his heart overflowing with cheerfulness and he gives it to one to whom he is ordered, he is one of the givers of charity.
[2232]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When a woman gives in charity some of the food in her house, without causing any damage, there is reward for her for whatever she has given, and a reward for her husband for what he earned. The same applies to the trustee. In no respect does the one diminish the reward of the other.
[2233]
This hadith has been narrated by Mansur with the same chain of transmitters (with this alteration of words): "from the food of her husband".
[2234]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When a woman spends (something as Sadaqa) out of the household of her husband without causing any damage, there is a reward for her and for him too like it for whatever he earned, and for her (for the wife) because of her spending (for the sake of Allah), and for the trustee also (there is a reward like it), without any reduction from their rewards.
[2235]
This hadith has been narratedby A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[2236]
Umair, the freed slave of Abi'l-Lahm reported: I was the slave (of Abi'l-Lahm). I asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) if I could give some charity out of my master's wealth. He said: Yes, and the reward is half and half between you two.
[2237]
'Umair, the freed slave of Abi'l-Lahm, said: My master commanded me to cut some meat in strips; (as I was doing it) a poor man came to me and I gave him some of it to eat. My master came to know of that, and he beat me. I came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and narrated it to him. He (the Holy Prophet) summoned him and said: Why did you beat him? He (Abi'l-Lahm) said: He gives away my food without being commanded to do so. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) sbid: The reward would be shared by you two.
[2238]
Hammam b. Munabbih said: These are some of the a hadith of Muhammad. the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), transmitted to us on the authority of Abu Huraira. So he narrated one hadith out of them (as this): The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: No woman should observe fast when her spouse is present (in the house) but with his permission. And she should not admit any (mahram) in his house, while he (her husband) is present, but with his permission. And whatever she spends from his earnings without his sanction, for him is half the reward.
[2239]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) assaying: If anyone contributes a pair of anything for the sake of Allah, he would be invited to enter Paradise (with these words): O servant of Allah. it is good (for you). These who engage in prayer will he invited to enter by the gate of prayer; those who take part in Jihad will be Invited to enter by the gate of Jihad; those wto give charity will be invited to enter by the gate of charity; and those who observe fast will be invited to enter by the gate ar-Rayyan. Abu Bakr Siddiq said: Messenger of Allah, is it necessary that a person be invited through one of these gates? Will anyone he invited to enter by all those gates? The Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) said: Yes, and I hope you will be one of them.
[2240]
This hadith has been narrated by Zuhri through another chain of transmitters.
[2241]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who spent pairs for the sake of Allah, the guardians of Paradise would call him, (in fact) every guardian of the door (of Paradise would welcome him saying): O, so and so, come on. Upon this Abu Bakr said: Messenger of Allah, (it means) there would be no distress on this person. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said. I hope you would be among them.
[2242]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Who has observed fast among you today? Abu Bakr (Allah be pleased with him) replied: It is I. He (the Holy Prophet again) said: Who among you follow. ed the bier today? Abu Bakr (Allah be pleased with him) replied: It is I. He (the Holy Prophet again) said: Who among you led a poor man today? Abu Bakr (Allah he pleased with him) replied: It is I. He (again) said: Who among you visited an invalid today? Abu Bakr (Allah be pleased with him) said: It is I. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Anyone in whom (these good deeds) are combined will certainly,enter paradise.
[2243]
Asma', daughter of Abu Bakr (Allah be pleated with him), reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to me: Spend, and do not calculate, or otherwise Allah would also calculate in your case.
[2244]
Asma' reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying (to her): Spend and do not calculate, (for) Allah would calculate in your case; and do not hoard, otherwise Allah would be withholding from you.
[2245]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Asma' through another chain of transmitters.
[2246]
Asma', daughter of Abu Bakr, reported that abe came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace he upon him) and said: Apostle of Allah, I have nothing with me, but only, that which is given to me by Zubair (for household expenses). Is there any sin for me if I spend out of that which is given to me (by Zabair)? Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: Spend according to your means; and do not hoard, for Allah will withhold from you.
[2247]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: 0 Muslim women, none of you should consider even a sheep's trotter too insignificant to give to her neighbour.
[2248]
Abu Huraira reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: Seven are (the persons) whom Allah would give protection with His Shade on the Day when there would be no shade but that of Him (i.e. on the Day of Judgment, and they are): a just ruler, a youth who grew up with the worship of Allah; a person whose heart is attached to the mosques; two persons who love and meet each other and depart from each other for the sake of Allah; a man whom a beautiful woman of high rank seduces (for illicit relation), but he (rejects this offer by saying): "I fear Allah" ; a person who gives charity and conceals it (to such an extent) that the right hand does not know what the left has given: and a person who remembered Allah in privacy and his eyes shed tears.
[2249]
This hadith has been narrated, on the authority, of Abu Huraira (with this change of words). "A person whose heart is attached to the mosque when he goes out of it till he returns to it."
[2250]
Abu Huraira reported that there came a person to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, which charity is the best? Upon this he said: That you should give charity (in a state when you are) healthy and close-fisted, one haunted by the fear of poverty, hoping to become rich (charity in such a state of health and mind is the best). And you must not defer (charity to such a length) that you are about to die and would he saying: This is for so and so, and this is for so and so. Lo, it has already come into (the possession of so and so).
[2251]
Abu Huraira reported that a person came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, which charity is the greatest in reward? (The Holy Prophet said): By your father, beware, you should give charity (in a state when you are) healthy and close-fisted, haunted by the fear of poverty, and still hoping to live (as rich). And you must not defer charity (to the time) when you are about to die, and would then say : "This is for so and so, and this for so and so." It has already become the possession of so and so.
[2252]
This hadith has been narrated with the same chain of transmitters except with this change (of words): "Which charity is most excellent?"
[2253]
Abdullah b. Umar reported that as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was sitting on the pulpit and talking about Sadaqa and abstention from begging, he said: The upper hand is better than the lower one, the upper being the one which bestows and the lower one which begs.
[2254]
Hakim b. Hizam reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said this: The most excellent Sadaqa or the best of Sadaqa is that after giving which the (giver) remains rich and the upper hand is better than the lower hand, and begin from the members of your household.
[2255]
Hakim b. Hizam reported: I begged the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), and he gave me. I again begged, he again gave me. I again begged, he again gave me, and then said: This property is green and sweet; he who receives it with a cheerful heart is blessed in it, and he who receives it with an avaricious mind would not be blessed in it, he being like one who eats without being satished, and the upper hand is better thad the lower hand.
[2256]
Abu Umama reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: 0 son of Adam, it is better for you if you spend your surplus (wealth), but if you withhold it, it is evil for you. There is (however) no reproach for you (if you withhold means necessary) for a living. And begin (charity) with your dependants; and the upper hand is better than the lower hand.
[2257]
Mu'awiya said: Be cautious about ahadith except those which were current during the reign of Umar, for he exhorted people to ftar Allah, the Exalted and majestic. I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: He upon whom Allah intends to bestow goodness, He confers upon him an insight in religion; and I heard the Messenger of Allah (way peace be upon him) as saying: I am the treasurer. To one whom I give out of (my own) sweet will, he would be blessed in that, but he whom I give (yielding to his constant begging and for his covetousness is like one who would eat, but would not be satisfied.
[2258]
Mu'awiya reported AUah's Messenger (may prom be upon him) as saying: Do not beg importunately, for, I swear by Allah, none of you who asks me for anything and manages to get what he asks for when I disapprove td it will he be blessed in that which I give him.
[2259]
'Amr b. Dinar reported from Wahb b. Munabbih: I went to his house in San'a' and he offered me nuts grown in his house to eat. And his brother said: I heard Mu'awiya b. Abu Sufyan saying that he had heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying, and then he made a mention (of a hadith) like one mentioned above.
[2260]
Abd al-Rahman b. Auf reported: I heard Mu'awiya b. Abu Sufyan saying in an address that he had heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying : He to whom Allah intends to do good, He gives him insight into religion. And I am only the distributor while Allah is the Bestower.
[2261]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The poor man (miskin) is not the one who goes round to the people and is dismissed with one or two morsels. and one or two dates. They (the Prophet's Companions) said: Messenger of Allah, then who is miskin? He said: He who does not get enough to satisfy him, and he is not considered so (as to elicit the attention of the benevolent people), so that charity way be given to him. and he does not beg anything from people.
[2262]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Miskin is not he who is dismissed with one or two dates, and with one morsel or two morsels. (In fact) miskin is he who abstains (from begging). Read if you so desire (the verse): "They beg not of men importunately)" (ii. 273).This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters.
[2263]
Hamza. son of 'Abdullah, reported on the authority of his father that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When a man is always begging from people. he would meet Allah (in a state) that there would be no flesh on his face.
[2264]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of the brother of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters, but no mention has been made of the word "muz'a" (piece).
[2265]
Hamza b. 'Abdullah b. Umar heard his father cay that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: The person would continue begging from people till he would come on the Day of Resurrection and there would be no flesh on his face.
[2266]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who begs the riches of others to increase his own is asking only for live coals, so let him ask a little or much.
[2267]
Abu Huraira is reported to have heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is letter for one among you to bring a load of firewood on his back and give charity out of it (and satisfy his own need) and be independent of people, than that he should beg from people, whether they give him anything or refuse him. Verily the upper hand is better than the lower hand, and begin (charity) with your dependants.
[2268]
Qais b. Abu Hizam reported: We came to Abu Huraira and he told Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said this: By Allah, (it is better) that one among you should go and bring a load of firewood on his back and he should sell it, and the rest of the hadith was narrated (like the previous one).
[2269]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is better for any one of you to tie a bundle of firewood and carry it on his back and sell it than to beg a person, he may give or may refuse.
[2270]
Malik al-Ashja'i reported: We, nine, eight or seven men, were in the company of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he said: Why don't you pledge allegiance to the Messenger of Allah?-while we had recently pledged allegiance. So we said: Messenger of Allah, we have already pledged allegiance to you. He again said: Why don't you pledge allegiance to the Messenger of Allah? And we said: Messenger of Allah, we have already pledged allegiance to you. He again said: Why don't you pledge allegiance to the Messenger of Allah? We stretched our hands and said: Messenger of Allah. we have already pledged allegiance to you. Now tell (on what things) should we pledge allegiance to you. He said I (You must pledge allegiance) that you would worship Allah only and would not associate with Him anything, (and observe) five prayers, and obey-(and he said onething in an undertone)-that you would not beg people of anything. (And as a consequence of that) I saw that some of these people did not ask anyone to pick up the whip for them if it fell down.
[2271]
Qabisa b. Mukhariq al-Hilali said: I was under debt and I came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and begged from him regarding it. He said: Wait till we receive Sadaqa, so that we order that to be given to you. He again said: Qabisa, begging is not permissible but for one of the three (classes) of persons: one who has incurred debt, for him begging is permissible till he pays that off, after which he must stop it; a man whose property has been destroyed by a calamity which has smitten him, for him begging is permissible till he gets what will support life, or will provide him reasonable subsistence; and a person who has been smitten by poverty. the genuineness of which is confirmed by three intelligent members of this peoples for him begging is permissible till he gets what will support him, or will provide him subsistence. Qabisa, besides these three (every other reason) for begging is forbidden, and one who engages in such consumes that what is forbidden.
[2272]
Salim b. Abdullah b. 'Umar reported on the authority of his father ('Abdullah b. 'Umar) that he had heard 'Umar b. Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) saying: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) gave me a gift, but I said : Give it to one who needs it more than I. He gave me wealth for the second time but I said: Give it to one who needs it more than I. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Take out of this wealth which comes to you without your being avaricious and without begging, but in other circumstance's do not let your heart hanker after it.
[2273]
Salim b. 'Abdullah reported on the authority of his father that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) gave to 'Umar b. Khattab some gift. Umar said to him: Messenger of Allah, give it to one who needs it more than I. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Take it; either keep it with you or give it as a charity, and whatever comes to you in the form of this type of wealth, without your being avaricious or begging for it, accept it, but in other circumstances do not let your heart hanker after it. And it was on account of this that Ibn 'Umar never begged anything from anyone, nor refused anything given to him.
[2274]
This hadith has been narrated by Abdullah b. al-Sa'di from 'Umar b. al-Khattab who heard it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[2275]
Ibn al-Sa'di Maliki reported: 'Umar b. Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) appointed me as a collector of Sadaqa. When I had finished that (the task assigned to me) and I handed over that to him (to 'Umar), he commanded me to (accept) some remuneration (for the work). I said: I performed this duty for Allah and my reward is with Allah. He said: Take whatever has been given to you, for I also performed this duty during the time of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He assigned me the task of a collector and I said as you say, and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to me: When you are given anything without your begging for it, (then accept it), eat it and give it in charity.
[2276]
Ibn al-Sa'di reported: 'Umar b. Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) appointed me as a collector of Sadaqat. The rest of the hadith in the same.
[2277]
Abu Huraira reported from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as having said this: The heart of an old person feels young for the love of two things: love for long life and wealth.
[2278]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said this: The heart of an old person is young for two things: for long life and love for wealth.
[2279]
Anas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The son of Adam grows old, but two (desires) in him remain young: desire for wealth and desire for life.
[2280]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Anas through another chain of transmitters.
[2281]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmitters.
[2282]
Anas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If the son of Adam were to possess two valleys of riches. he would long for the third one. And the stomach of the son of Adam is not filled but with dust. And Allah returns to him who repents.
[2283]
Anas b. Malik reported: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying this, but I do not know whether this thing was revealed to him or not, but he said to.
[2284]
Anas b. MILlik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If there were two valleys of gold for the son of Adam, he would long for an- other one. and his mouth will not be filled but with dust, and Allah returns to him who repents.
[2285]
Ibn Abbas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If there were for the son of Adam a valley full of riches, he would long to possess another one like it. and Ibn Adam does not feel satiated but with dust.1413 And Allah returns to him who returns (to HiM).1414 Ibn Abbas said: I do not know whether it is from the Qur'an or not; and in the narration transmitted by Zuhair it was said: I do not know whether it is from the Qur'an, and he made no mention of Ibn Abbas.
[2286]
Abu Harb b. Abu al-Aswad reported on the authority of his father that Abu Musa al-Ash'ari sent for the reciters of Basra. They came to him and they were three hundred in number. They recited the Qur'an and he said: You are the best among the inhabitants of Basra, for you are the reciters among them. So continue to recite it. (But bear in mind) that your reciting for a long time may not harden your hearts as were hardened the hearts of those before you. We used to recite a surah which resembled in length and severity to (Surah) Bara'at. I have, however, forgotten it with the exception of this which I remember out of it:"If there were two valleys full of riches, for the son of Adam, he would long for a third valley, and nothing would fill the stomach of the son of Adam but dust." And we used so recite a slirah which resembled one of the surahs of Musabbihat, and I have forgotten it, but remember (this much) out of it: "Oh people who believe, why do you say that which you do not practise" (lxi 2.) and "that is recorded in your necks as a witness (against you) and you would be asked about it on the Day of Resurrection" (xvii. 13).
[2287]
Abu Huraira reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: Richness does not lie in the abundance of (worldly) goods but richness is the richness of the soul (heart, self).
[2288]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up and addressed the people thus: 0 people, by Allah, I do not entertain fear about you in regard to anything else than that which Allah would bring forth for you in the form of adornment of the world. A person said: Messenger of Allah, does good produce evil? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) remained silent for a while and he then said: What did you say? He replied: Messenger of Allah, I said: Does good produce evil? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)said to him: The good does not produce but good. but among the plants the spring rain produces There some which kill with a tremour or nearly kill all but the animal which feeds on vegetation. It eats and when its flanks are distended, it faces the can. then when it has donged or urinated and chewed it returns and eats. He who accepts wealth rightly, Allah confers blessing on it for him. and he who takes wealth without any right, he is like one who eats and is not satisfied.
[2289]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: The most dreadful thing I fear in your case is what Allah brings forth for you in the form of the adornment of the world. They (the Prophet's Com panions) said: Messenger of Allah, what is the adornment of the world? He said: Blessings (the natural resources) of the earth. They (again) said: Messenger of Allah, does good produce evil? He said: No, only good comes out of good. No, only good comes out of good. No. only good comes out of good. All that which the spring rain helps to grow kills or is about to kill but (the animal) which feeds on vegetation. It eats and when its flanks are distended, it faces the sun, it chews the cud, it has dunged and urinated. it returns and eats. This wealth is green and sweet, and he who accepts it and applies it rightly, finds it a good help, but he who takes it wrongfully is like one who eats without being satisfied.
[2290]
Abu Said al-Khudri reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was sitting on the pulpit and we were sitting around him, and he said: What I am afraid of in regard to you after my death is that there would be opened for you the adornments of the world and its beauties. A person said: Messenger of Allah, does good produce evil? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) remained silent. And it was said to him (the man who had asked the question from the Holy Prophet): What Is the matter with you, that you speak with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) but he does not speak with you? We thought as if revelation was descending upon him. He regained himself and wiped the sweat from him and said: He was the inquirer (and his style of expression showed as if he praised him and then added): Verily good does not produce evil. Whatever the spring rainfall causes to grow kills or is about to kill, but that (animal) which feeds on vegetation. It eats till its flanks are filled ; it faces the sun and dungs and urinates. and then returns to eat. And this Wealth is a sweet vegetation, and it is a good companion for a Muslim who gives out of it to the needy, to the orphan. to the wayfarer, or something like that as the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who takes it without his right is like one who eats but does not feel satisfied, and it would stand witness against him on the Day of judgment.
[2291]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported that some people from among the Ansar begged from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he gave them. They again begged him and he again gave them, till when what was in his possession was exhausted he said: Whatever good (riches, goods) I have, I will not withhold it from you. He who refrains from begging Allah safeguards him against want. and he who seeks sufficiency, Allah would keep him in a state of sufficiency, and he who shows endurance. Allah would grant him power to endure, and none is blessed with an endowment better and greater than endurance.
[2292]
This hadith has been narrated by Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[2293]
'Amr b. al-'As reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He Is successful who has accepted Islam, who has been provided with sufficient for his want and been made contented by Allah with what He has given him.
[2294]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: 0 Allah, make the provision of Mahammad's family sufficient just to sustain life.
[2295]
Umar b. Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) distributed something. Upon this I said: Messenger of Allah, I swear by God, the others besides them were more deserving than these (to whom you gave charity). He said: They had in fact left no other alternative for me. but (that they should) either beg importunately from me or they would regard me as a miser, but I am not a miser.
[2296]
Anas b. Malik reported: I was walking with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he had put on a mantle of Najran with a thick border. A bedouin met him and pulled the mantle so violently that I saw this violent pulling leaving marks of the border of the mantle on the skin of the neck of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). And he (the bedouin) said: Muhammad, issue command that I should be given out of the wealth of Allah which is at your disposal. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) turned his attention to him and smiled, and then ordered for him a gift (provision).
[2297]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik through another chain of transmitters. And In the hadith transmitted by Ikrima b. 'Ammir there is an addition: "He (the bedouin) pulled his (mantle) so violently that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was drifted very close to the bedouin." And in the hadith transmitted by Hammam, (the words are): "He pulled it so violently that the mantle was torn and the border was left around the neck of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)."
[2298]
Miswar b. Makhrama reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) distributed some cloaks but did not bestow one upon Makhrama. Upon this Makhrama said: 0 my son, come along with me to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). So I went with him. He said: Enter the house and call him (to come out) for me. So I called him and he (the Holy Prophet) came out, and there was a cloak (from those already distributed) on him. He (the Holy Prophet) said: I had kept it for you. He (Makhrama), looked at it and was pleased.
[2299]
Miswar b. Makhrama reported: Some cloaks were presented to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). My father Makhrama said to me: Come along with me to him; perhaps we may be able to get anything out of that (stock of cloaks). My father stood at the door and began to talk. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) recognised him by his voice and came out and there was a cloak with him, and he was showing its beauties and saying: I kept it for you, I kept it for you.
[2300]
Sa'd reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) bestow- ed (some gifts) upon a group of people and I was sitting amongst them. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), however, left a person and he did not give him any. thing. and he seemed to me the most excellent among them (and thus deserved the gifts more than anyone else). So I stood up before the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said to him in undertone: Messenger of Allah, what obout so and so? By Allah, I find him a believer. He (the Messenger of Allah) said: He may be a Muslim. I kept quiet for a short while, and then what I knew of him urged me (to plead his case again) and I said: Messenger of Allah, what about so and so? By Allah, I find him a believer. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: He may,be a Muslim. I again remained quiet for a short while, and what I knew of him again urged me (to plead his case so I) said: Messenger of Allah, what about so and so? By Allah, I find him a believer. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: He may be a Muslim. I often bestow (something) upon a person, whereas someone else is dearer to me than he, because of the fear that he may fall headling into the fire. And in the hadith transmitted by Hulwani this statement was repeated twice.
[2301]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[2302]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Muhammad b. Sa'd through another chain of transmitters (and the words are): "The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) struck between my neck and shoulder with his hand and said: Do you wrangle, 0 Sa'd, because I bestow (some gifts) upon a person?"
[2303]
Anas b. Malik reported that when on the Day of Hunain Allah conferred upon His Apostle (may peace be upon him) the riches of Hawazin (without armed encounter), the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) set about distributing to some persons of Quraish one hundred camels Upon this they (the young people from the Ansar) said: May Allah grant pardon to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that he bestowed (these camels) upon the people of Quraish, and he ignored us, whereas our swords are still dripping blood. Anas b. Malik said: Their statement was conveyed to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he sent (someone) to the Ansar and gathered them under a tent of leather. When they had assembled, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to thera and said: What is this news that has reached me from you? The wise people of the Ansar said: Messenger of Allah, so far as the sagacious amongst us are concerned they have said nothing, but we have amongst us persons of immature age; they said: May Allah grant pardon to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that he gave to the Quraish and ignored us (despite the fact) that our swords are besmeared with their blood. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: I give (at times material gifts) to persons who were quite recently in the state of unbelief, so that I may incline them to truth Don't you feel delighted that people should go with riches, and you should go back to your places with the Apostle of Allah? By Allah, that with which you would return is better than that with which they would return. They said: Yes, Messenger of Allah, we are pleased. The Holy Prophet said too: You would find marked preference (in conferring of the material gifts) in future, so you should show patience till you meet Allah and His Messenger and I would he at the Haud Kauthar. They said: We would show patience.
[2304]
Anas b. Malik reported that when Allah conferred upon His Messenger (may peace be upon him) the riches of Hawazin (without armed encounter); the rest of the hadith is the same except some variation (of words): "Anas said: We could not tolerate it and he also said: The people were immature in age."
[2305]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik through another chain of transmitters.
[2306]
Anas b. Malik reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) gathered the Ansar and said: Is there someone alien among you? They said: No, but only the son of our sister. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The son of the sister of the people is included among the tribe, and (farther) said: The Quraish have recently abandoned Jahillyya and have just been delivered from distress; I, therefore, intend to help them and conciliate them. Don't you feel happy that the people should return with worldly riches and you return with the Messenger of Allah to your houses? (So far as my love for you is concerned I should say) if the people were to tread a valley and the Ansar tread a narraw path (in a mountain) I would tread the narrow path of the Ansar.
[2307]
Anas b. Malik reported: When Mecca was conquered, he (the Holy Prophet) distributed the spoils among the Quraish. Upon this the Ansar said: It is strange that our swords are dripping with their blood, whereas our spoils have been given to them (to the Quraish). This (remark) reached the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and so he gathered them and said: What is this that has been conveyed to me about you? They said: (Yes) it is that very thing that, has reached you-and they were not (the people) to speak lie. Upon this he said: Don't you like that the people should return to their houses along with worldly riches, whereas you should return to your houses with the Messenger of Allah? If the people were to tread a valley or d narrow path, and the Ansar were also to tread a valley or a narrow path, I would tread the valley (along with the) Ansar or the narrow path (along with the) Ansar.
[2308]
Anas b. Malik reported that when it was the Day of Hunain there came the tribes of Hawazin, Ghatafan and others along with their children and animals, and there were with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) that day ten thousand (soldiers), and newly freed men (of Mecca after its conquest). All these men (once) turned their backs, till he (the Holy Prophet) was left alone. He (the Messenger of Allah) on that day called twice and he did not interpose anything between these two (announcements) He turned towards his right and said: 0 people of Ansar ! They said: At thy beck and call (are we), Messenger of Allah. Be glad we are with thee. He then turned towards his left and said: 0 people of Ansar. They said: At thy beck and call (are we). Be glad we are with thee. He (the Holy Prophet) was riding a white mule. He dismounted and said: I am the servant of Allah and His Apostle. The polytheists suffered defeat. and the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) acquired a large quantity of spoils, and he distributed them among the refugees and the people recently delivered (of Mecca) but did not give anything to the Ansar. The Ansar said: In the hour of distress it is we who are called (for help). but the spoils are given to other people besides us. This (remark) reached him (the Holy Prophet). and he gathered them In a tent. and said: What is this news that has reached me on your behalf? They kept silence. Upon this he said: 0 people of Ansar, don't you like that people should go away with worldly (riches), and you go away with Muhammad taking him to your houses? They said: Yes, happy we are. Messenger of Allah. He (the Holy Prophet) said: If the people were to tread a valley, and the Ansar were to tread a narrow path, I would take the narrow path of the Ansar. Hisham said: I asked Abu Hamza if he was present there. He said: How could Ibe absent from him?
[2309]
Anas b. Malik reported: We conquered Mecca and then we went on an expedition to Hunain. The polytheists came, forming themselves into the best rows that I have seen. They first formed the rows of cavalry, then those of infantry, and then those of women behind them. Then there were formed the rows of sheep and goats and then of other animals. We were also people large in number, and our (number) had reached six thousand. And on one side Khalid b. Walid was in charge of the cavalry. And our horses at once turned back from our rear. And we could hardly hold our own when our horses were exposed, and the bedouins and the peoplewhom we knew took to their heels. (Seeing this) the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) called thus: 0 refugees, 0 refugees. He then.said: 0 Ansar, 0 Ansar. (Anas said: This hadith is transmitted by a group of eminent persons.) We said: At thy beck and call are we, Messenger of Allah. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then advanced and he (Anas) said: By Allah, we had not yet reached them when Allah defeated them. and we took possession of the wealth and we then marched towards Ta'if, and we besieged them for forty nights. and then came back to Mecca and encamped (at a place), and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) began to bestow a hundred camels upon each individual. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2310]
Rafi' b. Khadij reported that the Messenger of Allah; (may peace be upon him) gave to Abu Sufyan b. Harb and Saf wan. b. Umayya and 'Uyaina b. Hisn and Aqra' b. Habis, i.e. to every one of these persons, one hundred of camels, and gave to 'Abbas b. Mirdas less than this number. Upon this 'Abbas b. Mirdis said:  You allot the share of my booty and that of my horse between 'Uyaina and Aqra'.
Both Uyaina and Aqra' are in no way more eminent than Mirdas (my father) in the assembly.
I am in no way inferior to any one of these persons.
And he who is let downtoday would not be elevated.  He (the narrator) said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) then complet- ed one hundred camels for him.
[2311]
This hadith has been narrated by Sa'id b. Masruq with the same chain of transmitters (with the words): "The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) distributed the spoils of Hunain, and he (the Holy Prophet) gave one hundred camels to Abu Sufyan b. Harb. The rest of the hadith is the same, but with this addition: "He bestowed upon "Alqama b. 'Ulatha one hundred (camels)."
[2312]
This hadith has been narrated by Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters, but no mention has been made of Alqama b. 'Ulatha, nor of safwin b. Umayya, and he did not mention the verse in his hadith.
[2313]
Abdullah b. Zaid reported that when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) conquered Hunain he distributed the booty, and he bestowed upon those whose hearts it was intended to win. It was conveyed to him (the Holy Prophet) that the Ansar cherished a desire that they should be given (that very portion) which the people (of Quraish) had got. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up and, after having praised Allah and lauded Him, addressed them thus: 0 people of Ansar, did I not find you erring and Allah guided you aright through me, and (in the state of) being destitute and Allah made you free from want through me, and in a state of disunity and Allah united you through me, and they (the Ansar) said: Allah and His Messenger are most benevolent. He (again) said: Why do you not answer me? They said: Allah and His Messenger are the most benevolent. He said, If you wish you should say so and so, and the event (should take) such and such course (and in this connection he made a mention) of so many things. 'Amr is under the impressionthat he has not been able to remember them. He (the Holy Prophet) further said: Don't you feel happy (over this state of affairs) that the people should go away with goats and camels, and you go to your places along with the Messenger of Allah? The Ansar are inner garments (more close to me) and (other) people are outer garments. Had there not been migration, I would have been a man from among the Ansar. If the people were to tread a valley or a narrow path, I would tread the valley (chosen) by the Ansar or narrow path (trodden) by them. And you would soon find after me preferences (over you in getting material benefits). So you should show patience till you meet me at the Haud (Kauthar).
[2314]
Abdullah reported: On the day of Hunain, the Messenger of Allah(may peace be upon him) showed preference (to some) People in the distribution of the spoils. He bestowed on Aqra' b. Habis one hundred camels, and bestowed an equal (number) upon 'Uyaina, and bestowed on people among the elites of Arabia, and pre. ferred them) (to others) on that day, in the distribution (of spoils). Upon this a person said: By Allah, neither justice has been done In this distribution (of spoils), nor has the pleasure of Allah been sought in it. I (the Narrator ) said: By Allah, I will certainly inform the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about it. so I came to him and informed him about what he had said.- The colour of his (the Prophet's) face changed red like blood and he then said: Who would do justice, if Allah and His Messenger do not do justice? He further said: May Allah have mercy upon Moses; he was tormented more than this, but he showed patience. I said: Never would I convey him (the Holy Prophet) after this (unpleasant) narration.
[2315]
Abdullah reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) distributed spoils (of war). Upon this a person said: This is a distribution In which the pleasure of Allah has not been sought. I came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and informed him in an undertone. He (the Holy Prophet) was deeply angry at this and his face became red till I wished that I had not made a mention of it to him. He (the Holy Prophet) then said: Moses was tormented more than this, but he showed patience.
[2316]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that a person came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) at Jirana on his way back from Hunain, and there was in the clothes of Bilal some silver. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took a handful out of that and bestowed it upon the people. He (the person who had met the Prophet at Ji'rana) said to him: Muhammad, do justice. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Woe be upon thee, who would do justice if I do not do justice, and you would be very unfortunate and a loser if I do not do justice. Upon this Umar b. Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) said: Permit me to kill this hypocrite. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: May there be protection of Allah ! People would say that I kill my companions. This man and his companions would recite the Qur'an but it would not go beyond their throat, and they swerve from it just as the arrow goes through the prey.
[2317]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jabir b. 'Abdullah through another chain of transmitters.
[2318]
Abu Said Khudri reported that 'Ali (Allah be pleased with him) sent some gold alloyed with dust to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) distributed that among four men, al-Aqra b. Habis Hanzali and Uyaina b. Badr al-Fazari and 'Alqama b. 'Ulatha al-'Amiri, then to one person of the tribe of Kilab and to Zaid al-Khair al-Ta'l, and then to one person of the tribe of Nabhan. Upon this the people of Quraish felt angry and said: He (the Holy Prophet) gave to the chiefs of Najd and ignored us. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: I have done it with a view to con- cillating them. Then there came a person with thick beard, prominent cheeks, deep sunken eyes and protruding forehead and shaven head. He said: Muhammad, fear Allah. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: If I disobey Allah, who would then obey Him? Have I not been (sent as the) most trustworthy among the people of the-world?-but you do not repose trust in me. That person then went back. A person among the people then sought permission (from the Holy Prophet) for his murder. According to some, it was Khalid b. Walid who sought the permission. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him),said: From this very person's posterity there would arise people who would recite the Qur'an, but it would not go beyond their throat; they would kill the followers of Islam and would spare the idol-worshippers. They would glance through the teachings of Islam so hurriedly just as the arrow passes through the pray. If I were to ever find them I would kill them like 'Ad.
[2319]
Abu Said al-Khudri reported: 'Ali b. Abu Talib sent to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) from Yemen some gold alloyed with clay in a leather bag dyed in the leaves of Mimosa flava.He distributed it among four men. 'Uyaina b. Hisna, Aqra' b. Habis and Zaid al-Khail, and the fourth one was either Alqama b. 'Ulatha or 'Amir b. Tufail. A person from among his(Prophet's) Companions said: We had a better claim to this (wealth) than these (persons). This (remark) reached the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) upon which he said: Will you not trust me, whereas I am a trustee of Him Who is in the heaven? The news come to me from the heaven morning and evening. Then there stood up a person with deep snnken eyes, prominent cheek bones, and elevated forehead, thick beard, shaven head, tucked up loin cloth, and he said: Messenger of Allah, fear Allah. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Woe to thee. do I not deserve most to fear Allah amongst the people of the earth? That man then returned. Khalid b. Walid then said: Messenger of Allah, should I not strike his neck? Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: Perhaps he may be observing the prayer. Khalid said: How many observers of prayer are there who profess with their tongue what is not in their heart? Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: I have not been commanded to pierce through the hearts of people, nor to split their bellies (insides). He again looked at him and he was going back. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: There would arise a people from the progeny of this (man) who would recite the Qur'an glibly, but it would not go beyond their throats; they would (hurriedly) pass through (the teachings of their) religion just as the arrow passes through the prey. I conceive that he (the Holy Prophet) also said this: If I find them I would certainly kill them as were killed the (people of) Thamud.
[2320]
This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters and (the narrator) made a mention of elevated forehead, but he made no mention of tucked-up loin cloth and made this addition: "There stood up 'Umar b. Khattab (Allah be pleased with him), and said: Should I not strike his neck? Upon this he said: No. Then he turned away, and Khalid the Sword of Allah stood up against him, and said: Prophet of Allah. shall I not strike off his neck? He said, No, and then said: A people would rise from his progeny who would recite the Book of Allah glibly and fluently. 'Umar said: I think he (the Holy Prophet) also said this: If I find them I would certainly kill them like Thamud."
[2321]
This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters, but no mention has been made of: "If I find them, I would kill them as the Thamud were killed."
[2322]
Abu Salama and 'Ata' b. Yasar came to Abu Sa'id al-Khudri and asked him about Haruriya, saying: Did you hear the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) making a mention of them? He (Abu Sai'd al-Khudri) said: I don't know who the Haruriya are, but I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would arise in this nation (and he did not say "out of them") a people and you would hold insignificant your prayers as compared with their prayers. And they would recite the Qur'an which would not go beyond their throats and would swerve through the religion (as blank) just as a (swift) arrow passes through the prey. The archer looks at his arrow, at its iron head and glances at its end (which he held) in the tip of his fingers to see whether it had any stain of blood.
[2323]
Abu Sai'd al-Khudri reported: When we were in the company of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he was distributing the spoils of war, there came to him Dhul-Khuwasira, one of Banu Tamim. He said: Messenger of Allah, do justice. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Woe be upon thee I Who would do justice, if I do not do justice? You would be unsuccessful and incurring a loss, if I do not do justice. Upon this Umar b. Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) said: Messenger of Allah, permit me to strike off his neck. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Leave him, for he has friends (who would outwardly look to be so religious and pious) that everyone among you would consider his prayer insignificant as compared with their prayer, and his fast as com- pared with their fasts. They would recite the Qur'an but it would not go beyond their collar-bones. They would pass through (the teachings of Islam so hurriedly) just as the arrow passes through the prey. He would look at its Iron head, but would not find anything ticking) there. He would then see at the lowest end, but would not find anything sticking there. He would then see at its grip but would not find anything sticking to it. He would then see at its feathers and he would find nothing sticking to them (as the arrow would pass so quickly that nothing would stick to it) neither excre- ment nor blood. They would be recognised by the presence of a black man among them whose upper arms would be like a woman's breast, or like a piece of meat as it quivers, and they would come forth at the time when there is dissension among the people. Abu Sai'd said: I testify to the fact that I heard it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him),and I testify to the fact that 'Ali b. Abu Talib fought against them and I was with him. He gave orders about that man who was sought for, and when he was brought in, and when I looked at him, he was exactly as the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had described him.
[2324]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri said that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) made a mention of a sect that would be among his Ummah which would emerge out of the dissension of the people. Their distinctive mark would be shaven heads. They would be the worst creatures or the worst of the creatures. The group who would be nearer to the truth out of the two would kill them. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) gave an example (to give their description) or he said: A man throws an arrow at the prey (or he said at the target), and sees at its iron head, but finds no sign (of blood there), or he sees at the lowest end, but would not see or find any sign (of blood there). He would then see into the grip but would not find (anything) sticking to it. Abu Sai'd then said: People of Iraq. it is you who have killed them.
[2325]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: A group would secede itself (from the Ummah) when there would be dissension among the Muslims. Out of the two groups who would be nearer the truth would kill them.
[2326]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would be two groups in my Ummah, and there would emerge another group (seceding itself from both of them), and the party nearer to the truth among the two would kill them (the group of the Khwarij).
[2327]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) that a group (Khwarij) would emerge from the different parties (the party of Hadrat 'Ali and the party of Amir Mu'awiya), the group nearer the truth between the two would kill them.
[2328]
'Ali said: Whenever I narrate to you anything from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) believe it to be absolutely true as falling from the sky is dearer to me than that of attributing anything to him (the Holy Prophet) which he never said. When I talk to you of anything which is between me and you (there might creep some error in it) for battle is an outwitting. I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would arise at the end of the age a people who would be young in age and immature in thought, but they would talk (in such a manner) as if their words are the best among the creatures. They would recite the Qur'an, but it would not go beyond their throats, and they would pass through the religion as an arrow goes through the prey. So when you meet them, kill them, for in their killing you would get a reward with Allah on the Day of judgmelat.
[2329]
A hadith like this has been narrated through another chain of transmitters.
[2330]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters, but (these words) are not there: "They pass through the religion clean as the arrow passes through the prey."
[2331]
'Abida narrated from 'Ali that he made a mention of the Khwarij (and in this connection) said that there would be a person among them with a defective hand. (or with a short hand) or a fleshy hand. If you were to exercise restraint, I would tell you what Allah has promised to those who would kill them on the order of Mubarrmad (may peace be upon him). I (the narrator) said to him: Did you hear it from Muhammad: (may peace be upon him)? He (Hadrat 'Ali) said: Yes, by the Lord of the Ka'ba; Yes, by the Lord of the Ka'ba; yes, by the Lord of the Ka'ba.
[2332]
'Abida said: I will not narrate to you except what I heard from him (Hadrat 'Ali), and then he narrated from him.
[2333]
Zaid b. Wahb Jahani reported and he was among the squadron which wall under the command of Ali (Allah be pleased with him) and which set out (to curb the activities) of the Khwarij. 'Ali (Allah be pleased with him) said: 0 people, I heard the Messeinger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: There would arise from my Ummah a people who would recite the Qur'an, and your recital would seem insignificant as compared with their recital, your prayer as compared with their prayer, arid your fast,as compared with their fast. They would recite the Qur'an thinking that it sup- ports them, whereas it is an evidence against them. Their prayer does not get beyond their collar bone; they would swerve through Islam just as the arrow passes through the prey. If the squadron which is to encounter them were to know (what great boon) has been assured to them by their Apostle (may peace be upon him) they would completely rely upon this deed (alone and cease to do other good deeds), and their (that of the Khwarij) distinctive mark is that there would be (among them) a person whose wrist would be without the arm, and the end of his wrist would be fleshy like the nipple of the breast on which there would be white hair. You would be marching towards Muawiya and the people of Syria and you would leave them behind among your children and your property (to do harm). By Allah, I believe that these are the people (against whom you have been commanded to fight and get reward) for they have shed forbidden blood, and raided the animals of the people. So go forth in the name of Allah (to fight against them). Salama b. Kuhail mentioned that Zaid b. Wahb made me alight at every stage, till we crossed a bridge. 'Abdullah b. Wahb al-Rasibi was at the head of the Khwarij when we encountered them. He ('Abdullah) said to his army: Throw the spears and draw out your swords from their sheaths, for I fear that they would attack you as they attacked you on the day of Harura. They went back and threw their spears and drew out their swords, and people fought against them with spears and they were killed one after another. Only two persons were killed among the people (among the army led by Hadrat 'Ali) on that day. 'Ali (Allah be pleased with him) said: Find out from among them (the dead bodies of the Khwarij) (the maimed). They searched but did not find him. 'Ali (Allah be pleased with him) then himself stood up and (walked) till he came to the people who had been killed one after another. He ('Ali) said: Search them to the last, and then ('Ali's companions) found him (the dead body of the maimed) near the earth. He (Hadrat 'Ali) then pronounced Allah-O-Akbar (Allah is the Greatest) and then said, Allah told the Truth and His Messenger (may peace be upon him) conveyed it. Then there stood before him 'Abida Salmani who said: Commander of the Believers, by Allah, besides Whom there is no god but He, (tell me) whether you heard this hadith from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He said: Yes, by Allah, besides Whom there is no god but He. He asked him to take an oath thrice and he took the oath.
[2334]
'Ubaidullah b. Abu Rafi', the freed slave of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), said: When Haruria (the Khwarij) set out and as he was with 'Ali b. Abu Talib (Allah be pleased with him) they said, "There is no command but that of Allah." Upon this 'Ali said: The statement is true but it is intentionally applied (to support) a wrong (cause). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him described their characteristics and I found these characteristics in them. They state the truth with their tongue, but it does not go beyond this part of their bodies (and the narrator pointed towards his throat). The most hateful among the creation of Allah us one black man among them (Khwarij). One of his hand is like the teat of a goat or the nipple of the breast. When 'Ali b. Abu Talib (Allah be pleased with him) killed them, he said: Search (for his dead body). They searched for him, but they did not find it (his dead body). Upon this he said: Go (and search for him). By Allah, neither I have spoken a lie nor has the lie been spoken to me. 'Ali said this twice and thrice. They then found him (the dead body) in a rain. They brought (his dead) body till they placed it before him (Hadrat 'Ali). 'Ubaidullah said: And, I was present at (that place) when this happened and when 'Ali said about them. A person narrated to me from Ibn Hanain that he said: I saw that black man.
[2335]
Abu Dharr reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verily there would arise from my Ummah after me or soon after me a group (of people) who would recite the Qar'an, but it would not go beyond their throats, and they would pass clean through their religion just as the arrow passes through the prey, and they would never come back to it. They would be the worst among the creation and the creatures. Ibn Samit (one of the narrators) said: I met Rafi' b. 'Amr Ghifari, the brother of Al-Hakam Ghifari and I said: What is this hadith that I heard from Abu Dharr, i.e. so and so?-and then I narrated that hadith to him and said: I heard it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[2336]
Yusair b. 'Amr reported that he inquired of Sahl b. Hunaif: Did you hear the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) making a mention of the Khwarij? He said: I heard him say (and he pointed with his hand towards the east) that these would be a people who would recite the Qur'an with their tongues and it would not go beyond their collar bones. They would pass clean through their religion just as the arrow passes through the prey.
[2337]
This hadith had been transmitted by Sulaiman Shaibani with the same chain of narrators (and the words are), "There would arise out of (this group) many a group "
[2338]
Sahl b. Hunaif reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would arise from the east a people with shaven heads.
[2339]
Abu Huraira reported that Hasan b. 'Ali took one of The dates of the sadaqa and put it in his mouth, whereupon the Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: Leave it, leave it, throw it; don't you know that we do not eat the sadaqa?
[2340]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters (and the words of the Holy Prophet) are:"Sadaqa is not permis- sible for us."
[2341]
This very hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sbu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[2342]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I go back to my family and I find a date lying on my bed. I then take it up to eat it, but then I throw it away fearing that it may be a Sadaqa.
[2343]
Out of so many ahadith which Hammam b. Munabbih narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) one is this that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: I go back to my family and I find a date lying on my bed or in my house, and I take it up to eat it, but then I throw it away fearing that it may be a Sadaqa or from Sadaqa.
[2344]
Anas b. Malik reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) found a date in the street and said: If it were not of sadaqa I would have eaten it.1457
[2345]
Anas b. Malik reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) found a date lying on the path and said: If it were not out of Sadaqa, I would have eaten it.
[2346]
Anas b. Malik reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) found a date and said: Were it not (that I fear) it may be part of sadaqa, I would have eaten it.
[2347]
'Abd al-Muttalib b. Rabi'a b. al-Harith reported that Rabi'a b. al-Harith and Abbas b. Abd al-Muttalib gathered together and said: By Allah, if we had sent these two young boys (i.e. I and Fadl b. 'Abbas) to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and they had spoken to him, he would have appointed them (as the collectors) of these sadaqat; and they would (collect them) and pay (to the Holy Prophet) as other people (collectors) paid and would get a share as other people got it. As they were talking about it there came 'Ali b. Abu Talib and stood before them, and they made a mention of it to him. 'Ali b. Abu Talib said: Don't do that; by Allah he (the Holy Prophet) would not do that (would not accept your request). Rabi'a b. Harith turned to him and said: By Allah, you are not doing so but out of jealousy that you nurse against us By Allah, you became the son-in-law of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) but we felt no jealousy against you (for this great privilege of yours). 'Ali then said: Send them (if you like). They set out and 'Ali lay on the bed. When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) offered the noon prayer. we went ahead of him to his apartment and stood near it till he came out. He took hold of our ears (out of love and affection) and then said: Give out what you have kept in your hearts. He then entered (the apartment) and we also went in and he (the Holy Prophet) was on that day (in the house of) Zainab b. jahsh. We urged each (of us) to speak. Then one of us thus spoke: Messenger of Allah, you are the best of humanity and the best to cement the ties of blood-relations. We have reached the-marriageable age. We have come (to you) so that you may appoint us (as collectors) of these sadaqat. and we would pay you just as thin people (other collectors) pay you, and get our share as others get it. He (the Holy Prophet) kept silence for a long time till we wished that we should speak with him (again), and Zainab pointied to us from behind the curtain not to talk (any more). He (the Holy Prophet) said; It does not become the family of Muhammad (to accept) sadaqat for they are the impurities of people. You call to me Mahmiya (and he was in charge of khums, i.e, of the one-fifth part that goes to the treasury out of the spoils of war), and Naufal b. Harith b. 'Abd al-Muttalib. They both came to him, and he (the Holy Prophet) said to Mahmiya: Marry your daughter to this young man (i.e. Fadl b. 'Abbas), and he married her to him And he said to Naufal b. Harith: Marry your daughter to this young man (i e. 'Abd al-Muttalib b. Rabi'a, the narrator of this hadith) and he married her to me, and he said to Mahmiya: Pay so much mahr on behalf of both of them from this khums Zuhri, however. said: He did not determine (the amount of mahr).
[2348]
Rabi'a b. Harith b. 'Abd al-Muttalib and Abbas b. 'Abd al-Muttalib said to Abd al-Muttalib b. Rabi'a and Fadl b. Ibn Abbas: Go to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and the rest of the hadith is the same (but with this addition): "'Ali spread his cloak and then lay down on it and said: I am the father of Hasan, and I am the chief. By Allah, I would not move from my place till your sons come back to you with the reply to that for which you sent them to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). And he then also said: Verily these sadaqat are the impurities of people, and they are not permissible for Muhammad (may peaace be upon him), and for the family of Muhammad. And he also said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) also said to me: Call Mahmiya b. Jaz', and he was person from Banu Asad. and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had apointed him as a collector of khums.
[2349]
Juwayriya, the wife of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)" said that Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to her and said: Is there anything to eat? She said: Messenger of Allah, I swear by God, there is no food with us except a bone of goat which my freed maid-servant was given as sadaqa. Upon this he said : Bring that to me, for it (the sadaqa) has reached its destination.
[2350]
This hadith has been narrated by Zuhri with the same chain of trainsmitters.
[2351]
Anas b. Malik reported that Barira presented to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) a piece of meat which had been given to her as sadaqa. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: That is a Sadaqa for her and a gift for us.
[2352]
'A'isha reported that (once) the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him,) was presented with beef.It was said (by someone) that it had been given to Barira as Sadaqa. Upon this he (the Prophet) said: It is a Sadaqa for her and a gift for us.
[2353]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: Three are the decions (of the Shari'ah that we have come to know) through Barira. The people gave her sadaqa and she offered us as gift. We made a mention of it to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: It is a sadaqa for her and a gift for you; so eat it.
[2354]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'isha through another chain of transmitters.
[2355]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of 'A'isha in a similar manner except a slight variation that he said: "That is a gift for us out of it."
[2356]
Umm 'Atiyya, said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent me some mutton of sadaqa. I sent a piece out of that to 'A'isha. When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to 'A'isha, he said: Have you anything with you (to eat)? She said: Nothing, except only that mutton sent to us by Nusaiba (the kunya of Umm 'Atiyya) which you had sent to her. Whereupon he said: It has reached its proper place.
[2357]
Abu Huraira reported: Whenever the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) was presented with food, he asked about it, If he was told that it was a gift, he ate out of that, and if he was told that it was a sadaqa he did not eat out of that.
[2358]
'Abdullah b. Abu Aufa said that it was the common practice of the Mes- senger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that when the people brought to him sadaqa he blessed them: 0 Allah, bless them. So when Abu Aufa brought to him Sadaqa he (the Holy Prophet) said: 0 Allah, bless,the posterity of Abu Aufa.
[2359]
This hadith has been narrated by Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters (but with a slight variation of words, that he said): (0 Allah), bless them."
[2360]
Jarir b. 'Abdullah said:'When the collector of sadaqat (Zakat) comes to you, (you should see) that he goes away pleased with you.
[2361]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When there comes the month of Ramadan, the gates of mercy are opened, and the gates of Hell are locked and the devils are chained,
[2362]
This hadith is reported by Abu Huraira (with a slight alteration of words) that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: "When (the month of) Ramadan begins."
[2363]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying in connection with Ramadan: Do not fast till you see the new moon, and do not break fast till you see it; but if the weather is cloudy calculate about it.
[2364]
Ibn Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) made a mention of Ramadan and he with the gesture of his hand said: The month is thus and thus. (He then withdrew his thumb at the third time). He then said: Fast when you see it, and break your fast when you see it, and if the weather is cloudy calculate it (the months of Sha'ban and Shawwal) as thirty days.
[2365]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of 'Ubaidullah with the same chain of transmitters, and he said: If (the sky) is cloudy for you, then calculate thirty days (for the month of Ramadan).
[2366]
'Ubaidullah narrated on the authority of the same chain of transmitters that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) made a mention of Ramadan and said: The month may consist of twenty-nine days, and it may be thus, thus and thus, and (he further) said: Calculate it, but he did not say thirty.
[2367]
Ibn'Umar (Allah be pleased with-both of them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The month of Ramadan may consist of twenty-nine days. So do not fast till you have sighted it (the new moon) and do not break fast, till you have sighted it (the new moon of Shawwal), and if the sky is cloudy for you, then calculate.
[2368]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The month (of Ramadan) may consist of twenty nine days; so when you see the new moon observe fast and when you see (the new moon again at the commencement of the month of Shawwal) then break It, and if the sky is cloudy for you, then calculate it (and complete thirty days).
[2369]
'Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported Allah's Measenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When you see the new moon, observe fast, and when you see it (again) then break it, and if the sky is cloudy for you, then calculate it.
[2370]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The month may consist of twenty-nine nights. So do not fast till you have sighted it (the new moon) and do not break it till you have sighted it, except when the sky is cloudy for you, and if it is so, then calculate it.
[2371]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The month is thus and thus and thus (i.e. pointing with his fingers thrice), and he held back his thumb at the third time (in order to show that it can also consist of twenty-nine days).
[2372]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The month may consist of twenty-nine days.
[2373]
Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The mouth (of Ramadan) is thus and thus, and thus. i.e. ten, ten and-nine.
[2374]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The month is thus, and thus, and thus, and he flapped his hands with all their fingers twice. but at the third turn, folded his right thumb or left thumb (in order to give an idea of twenty-nine).
[2375]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The month (of Ramadan) may consist of twenty. nine days, and Shu'ba (one of the narrators) (gave a practical demonstration how the Holy prophet (may peace be upon him) explained to them) by unfolding his hands thrice and folding his thumb at the third turn. 'Uqba (one of the narrators in this chain of trans- mitters) said: I think that he said that the month consists of thirty days and unfolded his palm three times.
[2376]
Ibn 'Umar(may Allah be pleased with both of them)reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: We are an unlettered people who can neither write nor count. The month is thus, and thus. folding his thumb when he said it the third time. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Aswad b. Qais with the same chain of transmitters, but herein no mention has been made of the other month (consisting of) thirty days.
[2377]
Sa'd b.'Ubaida reported that Ibn'Umar(Allah be pleased with both of them) heard a person saying: This night is the midnight (of the month). Upon this he said to him: How do you know that it is the midnight (of the month), for I heard the Mes- senger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: The month is thus and thus (and he pointed with his ten fingers twice) and thus (i.e. at the third time he pointed with all his fingers but withdrew or folded his thumb)?
[2378]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Whenever you sight the new moon (of the month of Ramadan) observe fast. and when you sight it (the new moon of Shawwal) break it, and if the sky is cloudy for you, then observe fast for thirty days.
[2379]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Observe fast on sighting it (the new moon) and break (fast) on sighting it (the new moon), but if the sky is cloudy for you, then complete the number (of thirty).
[2380]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Observe fast on sighting it (the new moon) and break it on sighting it. But if (due to clouds) the actual position of the month is concealed from you, you should then count thirty (days).
[2381]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) narrated that the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) made a mention of the new moon and (in this connection) said: Observe fast when you see it (the new moon) and break fast when you see it (the new moon of Shawwal), but when (the actual position of the month is) concealed from you (on account of cloudy sky), then count thirty days.
[2382]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)as saying: Do not observe fast for a day, or two days ahead of Ramadan except a person who is in the habit of observing a particular fast; he may fast on that day.
[2383]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yahya b. Abi Kathir with the same chain of transmitters.
[2384]
Zuhri reported that (once) the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) took an oath that he would not go to his wives for one Month. Zuhri said that 'Urwa narrated to him from 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) that she said: When twenty-nine nights were over, which I had counted, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to me (he came to me first of all). I said: Messenger of Allah, you had taken an oath that you would not come to us for a month, whereas you have come after twenty nine days which I have counted. Whereupon he said: The month may also consist of twenty-nine days.
[2385]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with her) narrated that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) separated himself from his wives for a month. (His wives said:) He came to us on the twenty-ninth day, whereupon we said: It is the twenty-ninth (day) today. Thereupon he said: So far as the month is concerned, (and he, with a view to explaining it) flapped his hands thrice, but held back one finger at the last turn.
[2386]
Abu Zubair is reported to have heard Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with both of them) as saying: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) separated himself from his wives for a month. (His wives said:) He came to us on the morning of the twenty-ninth. Upon this some, of the people said: It is the morning of twenty- ninth (according to our calculation). Upon this the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The month. may also consist of twenty-nine days. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) then flapped his bands thrice, twice with all the fingers of both his hand (to indicate twenty-nine) and by the third time with nine (fingers).
[2387]
Umm Salama (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) took an oath that he would not go to some of his wives for the whole of the month. When twenty-nine days bad passed he (the Holy Prophet) went to them in the morning or in the evening. Upon this it was said to him: Apostle of Allah, you took an oath that you would not come to us for a month, whereupon he said: The month may also consist of twenty-nine days.
[2388]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Juraij with the same chain of transmitters.
[2389]
Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas (Allah be pleased with him) said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) struck his hand against the other and (then with the gesture of his two hands) said: The month is thus, thus (two times). He then withdrew (one of) his fingers at the third turn.
[2390]
Muhammad b. Sa'd reported on the authority of his father (Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas (Allah be pleased with him) that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: Tho month is thus and thus, and thus, i.e. ten, ten and nine. This hadith has been narrated by Abu Khalid with the same chain of transmitters.
[2391]
Kuraib reported that Umm Fadl, daughter of Harith, sent him (Fadl, i.e. her son) to Mu'awiya in Syria. I (Fadl) arrived in Syria, and did the needful for her. It was there in Syria that the month of Ramadan commenced. I saw the new moon (of Ramadan) on Friday. I then came back to Medina at the end of the month. Abdullah b. 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) asked me (about the new moon of Ramadan) and said: When did you see it? I said.: We saw it on the night of Friday. He said: (Did) you see it yourself?-I said: Yes, and the people also saw it and they observed fast and Mu'awiya also observed fast, whereupon he said: But we saw it on Saturday night. So we would continue to observe fast till we complete thirty (lasts) or we see it (the new moon of Shawwal). I said: Is the sightidg of the moon by Mu'awiya not valid for you? He said: No; this is how the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) has commanded us. Yahya b. Yahya was in doubt (whether the word used in the narration by Kuraib) was Naktafi or Taktafi.
[2392]
Abu'l-Bakhtari reported: We went out to perform Umra and when we encamped in the valley of Nakhla, we tried to see the new moon. Some of the people said: It was three nights old, and others (said) that it was two nights old. We then met Ibn 'Abbas and told him we had seen the new moon, but that some of the people said it was three nights old and others that it was two nights old. He asked on which night we had seen it; and when we told him we had seen it on such and such night, he said the Prophet of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: Verily Allah deferred it till the time it is seen, so it is to be reckoned from the night you saw it.
[2393]
Abu'l-Bakhtari reported: We saw the new moon of Ramadan as we were at Dhit-i-'Irq. We sent a man to Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with both of them) to ask him (whether the sighting of a small moon had something of the nature of defect in it). Upon this Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with both of them) said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: Verily Allah deferred its sight, but if (the new moon) is hidden from you, then,complete its number (thirty).
[2394]
The son of Abu Bakra reported it on the authority of his father that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: The two months of 'Id, Ramadan and Dhu'l-Hijja (are not incomplete).
[2395]
'Abd ar-Rahman b. Abu Bakra reported on the authority of Abu Bakra that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: The months of 'Id are not incomplete. And in the hadith narrated by Khalid (the words are): "The months, of 'Id are Ramadan and Dhu'l-Hijja."
[2396]
'Adi b. Hatim (Allah be pleased with him) reported that when (this verse) was revealed: "Until the white streak of the dawn becomes distinct from the dark streak" (ii. 187) Adi b. Hatim said: Messenger of Allah, verily I keep underneath my pillow two strings, one white and the other black, by which I distinguish night from dawn. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Your pillow seems to be very large. For the word khait implies the blackness of the night and the whiteness of the dawn.
[2397]
Sahl b. Sa'd said that when this verse was revealed: "Eat and drink till the white streak is distinct from the dark streak," a person would take hold of a white thread and a black thread and keep on eating till he could find them distinct (in the light of the dawn). It was then that Allah, the Majestic and Great, reveiled (the words) min al-fajr (from the dawn), and then it became clear (that the word khait refers to the streak of light in the dawn).
[2398]
Sahl b. Sa'd (Allah be pleased with him) said : When this verse was reveal- ed. "Eat and drink till the white streak becomes distinct from the dark streak for you," the person who decided to observe fast tied on one of his feet a black thread and on the other a white thread. And he went on eating and drinking till he could distinguish (between their colour) on seeing them. It was after this that Allah reveal- ed (the words): min al-fajr. And they (the Muslims) came to know that (the word khait) refers to the night and day.
[2399]
'Abdullah b. Mas'ud (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had said: Bilal would pronounce Adhan (at the fag end of the night in order to inform the people about the time of the Sahri). So you eat and drink till you hear the Adhan of Ibn Umm Maktum (which was pro- nounced at the conclusion of the Sahri and the commencement of the fast).
[2400]
Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: Bilal announces Adhan during the night, so you eat and drink, till you hear the Adhan of Ibn Umm Maktum.
[2401]
Ibn 'Umar(Allah be pleased with both of them)reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had two Mu'adhdhins,Bilal and son of Umm Maktum, the blind. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Bilal announces Adhan at (the fag end of the) night (i.e. Sahri), so eat and drink till the son of Umm Maktum announces Adhan.And he (the narrator) said: And the (difference of time) between their (Adhans) was not more than this that one climbed down (from the minaret) and the other climbed up (to announce Adhan).
[2402]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her).
[2403]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of 'Ubaidullah on the two chains of transmitters.
[2404]
Ibn Mas'ud (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying The Adhan of Bilal should not restrain anyone among you from eating Sahur (last meal before daybreak during the month of Ramadan) for he announces Adhan (or he calls) at (the fag end of) the night to make him turn who stands for prayer among you, and to awaken those who are sleeping among you. And he said: The dawn is not like it, as one says (and he lifted his hand) till he (dispersed his fingers) and said: It is like this.
[2405]
This hadith has been narrated by Sulaiman al-Taimi with the same chain of transmitters (but with a slight variation of words) that he (the Holy Prophet) said: The dawn is not like it as it is said; he then gathered his fingers and lowered them. But he said, it is like this (and he placed the index finger upon the other one and spread his hand).
[2406]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sulaiman Taimi with the same chain of transmitters and, at the end, it was said that the first Adhan was meant to awaken those who were in slumber amongst them and in order to make them turn who stand in (prayer) among them (towards food at the commencement of the fast). Jarir (one of the narrators) said that the Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not say like this but he said like it (true dawn) that the streaks of (true dawn ) are horizontal and not vertical.
[2407]
Samura b. Jandub reported Muhammad (may peace be upon him) as saying. The call of Bilal may not mislead any one of you (and he may, under the wrong impression gathered from it, refrain) from taking meal before the commencement of the fast (for the streaks) of this whiteness (which are vertical indicate the false dawn and the true dawn with which the fast commences is that when the streaks of light are) spread.
[2408]
Samura b. Jundub reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Adhan of Bilal should not mislead you nor the whiteness (of the pillar) of dawn, for it is not the whiteness of the true dawn, but that of the false dawn which is vertical like a pillar and you can eat food till the streaks of whiteness spread like it.
[2409]
Samura b. Jundub (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Adhan of Bilal may not mislead you with regard to your food at the commencement of the fast, nor the vertical (streaks) of whiteness in the horizon (for it is an indication of false dawn). You should stop eating (food) till (the whiteness) spreads like it.Hammad narrated it and with the gesture of his band he explained,the horizontal position (of the streaks of light).
[2410]
Samura b. Jundub addressed and narrated from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) having said (these words): Neither the call of Bilal should mislead you nor this whiteness (of false dawn) till (the true) dawn appears (or he said) till the dawn breaks.
[2411]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Samura b.Jundub.
[2412]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Take meal a little before dawn, for there is a blessing in taking meal at that time.
[2413]
'Amr b. al-'As reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The difference between our fasting and that of the people of the Book is eating shortly before dawn.
[2414]
Musa b. 'Ali has narrated this hadith through the same chain of transmitters.
[2415]
Zaid b. Thabit (Allah be pleased with him) said: We took meal shortly before dawn along with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). We then stood up for prayer. I said: How much span of time was there between the two (acts, i.e. taking of Sahri and observing of prayer)? He said (a span of reciting) fifty verses.
[2416]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Qatada too.
[2417]
Sahl b. Sa'd (Allah be pleased with him) repotted Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The people will continue to prosper as long as they hasten the breaking of the fast.
[2418]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by Sahl b. Sa'd.
[2419]
Abu 'Atiyya reported: I and Masruq went to 'A'isha and said to her: Mother of the Believers, there are two persons among the Companions of Muhammad (may peace be upon him) one among whom hastens in breaking the fast and in observing prayer, and the other delays breaking the fast and delays observing prayer. She said: Who among the two hastens in breaking fast and observing prayers? We said, It is 'Abdullah. i.e. son of Mas'ud. whereupon she said: This is how the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did. Abu Kuraib added: The second one was Abu Musa.
[2420]
Abu 'Atiyya reported: I and Misruq went to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) and Masruq said to her: There are two persons among the Companions of Muhammad (may peace be upon him) none of whom abandons the good, but one of them hastens to observe sunset prayer and break the fast, and the other delays in observing the sunset prayer and in breaking the fast, whereupon she said: Who hastens to observe sunset prayer and break the fast ? He said: It is 'Abdullah. Upon this she said: This is how the Messenger of Allah(may peace be upon him) used to do.
[2421]
'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When the night approaches and the day retreates and the sun sinks down, then the observer of the fast should break it. Ibn Numair made no mention of the word "then".
[2422]
'Abdullah b. Abi Aufa reported: We were with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on a journey during the month of Ramadan. When the sun had sunk he said: So and so, get down (from your ride) and prepare the meal of parched barley for us. He said: Messenger of Allah, still (there is light of) day. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Get down and prepare meal of parched barley for us. So he got down and prepared the meal of parched barley and offered him, and the apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) drank that (liquid meal). He then told with the gesture of his hand that when the sun sank from that side and the night appeared from that side, then the observer of the fast should break it.
[2423]
Ibn Abi Aufa (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We were with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on a journey. When the sun sank he said to a person: Get down and prepare barley meal for us. Upon this he said: Messenger of Allah, let there be dusk. (He the Holy Prophet) said: Get down and prepare barley meal for us. He (the person) said: There is still (the light of) day upon us. (But) he got down (in obedience to the command of the Holy Prophet) and prepared a barley meal for him and he (the Holy Prophet) drank that (liquid meal) and then said: When you see the night approaching from that side (west) (and he pointed towards the east with his hand), then the observer of the fast should break it.
[2424]
Abdullah b. Abi Aufa (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We travelled with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) as he had been observing fast. When the sun sank he said: So and so, get down and prepare barley meal for us. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2425]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Abi Aufa (Allah be pleased with him) through another chain of transmitters (but with a sight alteration of words): In this hadith transmitted by one of the narrators (neither these words are found): During the month of Ramadan." nor his statement: "And the night prevails from that side (the eastern side)." (These words are found in the narration of)Hushaim only.
[2426]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them) said that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade uninterrupted fasting. They (some of the Companions) said: You yourself fast uninterruptedly, whereupon he said: I am not like you. I am fed and supplied drink (by Allah).
[2427]
Ibn 'Umar reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) abserved fasts uninterruptedly in Ramadan and the people (in his wake) did this. But he forbade them to do so. It was said to him (to the Holy Prophet): You yourself observe the fasts uninterruptedly (but you forbid us to do so) Upon this he said:I am not like you; I am fed and supplied drink (by Allah).
[2428]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with both of them), but he did not make mention of (the words): "During the month of Ramadan."
[2429]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade (his Companions) from observing fast unintermptedly. One of the Muslims said: Messenger of Allah, you yourself observe Saum Wisal. whereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Who among you is like me? I spend night (in a state) that my Allah feeds me and provides me drink. When they (the Companions of the Holy Prophet) did not agree in abandoning the uninterrupted fast, then the Holy Prophet (may peace.be upon him) also observed this fast with them for a day, and then for a day. They then saw the new moon and he (the Holy Prophet) said: If the appearance of the new moon were delayed. I would have observed more (fasts) with you (and he did it) by way of warning to them as they had not agreed to refrain (from observing Saum Wisal)
[2430]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Abstain from Saum-Wisal.They (his Companions) said: Messenger of Allah, but you observe Saum Wisal. Upon this he said: You are not like me in this matter, for I spend my night (in a state) that my Lord feeds me and provides me drink Devote yourselves to the deeds (the burden of which) you can bear.
[2431]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying (the words as said in the previous hadith) but with this alteration (of words): "Take upon yourselves (the burden of the deeds) for which you have the strength to bear."
[2432]
Abu Huraira reported that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade (his Companions) to observe Saum Wisal.
[2433]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was observing prayer during Ramedan. I came and stood by his side. Then another man came and he stood likewise till we became a group.When the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) perceived that we were behind him, he lightened the prayer. He then went to his abode and observed such (a long) prayer (the like of which) he never observed with us. When it was morning we said to him: Did you perceive us during the night? Upon this he said: Yes, it was this (realisation) that induced me to do that which I did. He (the narrator) said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) began to observe Saum Wisal at the end of the month (of Ramadan), and some persons among his Companions began to observe this uninter- rupted fast, whereupon the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: What about such persons who observe uninterrupted fasts? You are not like me. By Allah. if the month were lengthened for me, I would have observed Saum Wisal, so that those who act with an exaggeration would (have been obliged) to abandon their exaggeration.1501
[2434]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed Saum Wisal during the early part of the month of Ramadan. The people among Muslims also observed uninterrupted fast. This (news) reached him (the Holy Prophet) and he said: Had the month been lengthened for me I would have continued observing Saum Wisal, so that those who act with forced hardness would (have been obliged) to abandon it. You are not like me (or he said): I am not like you. I continue to do so (in a state) that my Lord feeds me and provides me drink.
[2435]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade them (his Companions) to observe Saum Wisal out of mercy for them. They said: You (Holy Prophet) yourself observe it. Upon this he said: I am not like you. My Lord feeds me and provides me drink.
[2436]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) kissed one of his wives while he was fasting, and then she ('A'isha) smiled (as she narrated).
[2437]
Sufyan reported: I said to 'Abd al-Rahman b. Qasim: Have you heard from your father narrating from 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) that he kissed her while observing fast? He ('Abd al-Rahman b. Qasim) kept silence for a short while and then said: "Yes."
[2438]
'A'isha reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to kiss me while observing fast; and who among you can control his desire as the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) could control his desire.
[2439]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to kiss (his wives) while fasting and embraced (them) while fasting; but he had the greatest mastery over his desire among you.
[2440]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to kiss (his wives) while fasting; and he had the greatest control over his desire (as compared with you).
[2441]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to embrace (his wives) while fasting.
[2442]
Aswad reported: I and Masruq went to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) and asked. her if the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) embraced (his wives) while fasting. She said: Yes; but he had the greatest control over his desire among you: or he was one of those who had control over his desire. It is further narrated on the authority of Aswad and Masruq that they went to the Mother of the Believers and they asked her (and the rest of the hadith is the same)
[2443]
'Urwa b. Zubair narrated that 'A'isha the Mother of the Believers (Allah be pleased with her) informed him that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) kissed her while fasting.
[2444]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Yahya b. Abu Kathir with the same chain of transmitters.
[2445]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to kiss her during the month of fasting.
[2446]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) kissed (his wives) during Ramadan while observing fast.
[2447]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Apostle (peace be upon him) kissed (his wives) while fasting.
[2448]
Hafsa (Allah be pleased with her) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) kissed (his wives) while fasting.
[2449]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Hafsa (Allah be pleased with her) through another chain of transmitters.
[2450]
Umar b Abu Salama reported that he asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him): Should one observing fast kiss (his wife)? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to him: Ask her (Umm Salama). She informed him that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did that, where upon he said: Messenger of Allah, Allah pardoned thee all thy sins, the previous and the later ones. Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)) said: By Allah, I am the most God conscious among you and I fear Him most among you.
[2451]
Abu Bakr (he is Abu Bakr b. Abd al-Rahman b. Harith) reported: I heard Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) narrating that he who is overtaken by dawn in a state of seminal emission should not observe fast. I made a mention of it to 'Abd al-Rahman b. Harith (i.e. to his father) but he denied it. 'Abd al-Rahman went and I also went along with him till we came to'A'isha and Umm Salama (Allah be pleased with both of them) and Abd al-Rahman asked them about it. Both of them said: (At times it so happened) that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) woke up in the morning in a state of junub (but without seminal emission in a dream) and observed fast He (the narrator) said: We then proceeded till we went to Marwan and Abd al-Rahman made a mention of it to him. Upon this Marwan said: I stress upon you (with an oath) that you better go to Abu Huraira and refer to him what is said about it. So we came to Abu Huraira and Abu Bakr had been with us throughout and 'Abd al-Rahman made a mention of it to him, whereupon Abu Huraira said: Did they (the two wives of the Holy Prophet) tell you this? He replied: Yes Upon this (Abu Huraira) said: They have better knowledge. Abu Huraira then attributed that what was said about it to Fadl b. 'Abbas and said: I heard it from Fadl and not from the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). Abu Huraira then retracted from what he used to say about it. Ibn Juraij (one of the narrators) reported: I asked 'Abd al-Malik, if they (the two wives) said (made the statement) in regard to Ramadan, whereupon he said: It was so, and he (the Holy Prophet) (woke up in the) morning in a state of junub which was not due to the wet dream and then observed fast.
[2452]
'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), said: The dawn broke upon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) during the Ramadan in a state of junub not because of sexual dream (but on account of intercourse) and he washed himself and observed fast.
[2453]
Abu Bakr reported that Marwan sent him to Umm Salama to ask whether a person should observe fast who is in a state of junub and the dawn breaks upon him, whereupon she said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (was at times) junbi on account of intercourse and not due to sexual dream, and the dawn broke upon him, but he neither broke the fast nor recompensed.
[2454]
Abu Bakr b. 'Abd al-Rahman b. al-Harith b. Hisham reported on the authority of 'A'isha and Umm Salama, the wives of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him): The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) at times got up in the morning in a state of junub on account of having a sexual intercourse (with his wives during night) but not due to sexual dreams in the month of Ramadan, and would observe fast.
[2455]
'A'isha reported that a person came to the Apottle of Allah (may peace be upon him) asking for a fatwa (religious verdict). She ('A'isha) had been overhearing it from behind the curtain. 'A'isha added that he (the person) had said: Messenger of Allah, (the time) of prayer overtakes me as I am in a state of junub; should I observe fast (in this state)? Upon this the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: (At times the time) of prayer overtakes me while I am in a state of junub, and I observe fast (in that very state), whereupon he said: Messenger of Allah, you are not like us Allah has pardoned all your sins, the previous ones and the later ones. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: By Allah, I hope I am the most God-fearirg of you, and possess the best knowledge among you of those (things) against which I should guard.
[2456]
Sulaiman b. Yasar reported that he asked Umm Salama whether a person (who gets up) in the morning in a state of junub should observe fast. She said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (at times) got up in the morning in a state of junub, not because of sexual dreams (but on account of intercourse at night), and then observed fast.
[2457]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that a person came to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, I am undone. He (the Holy Prophet) said: What has brought about your ruin? He said: I have had intercourse with my wife during the month of Ramadan. Upon this he (the Holy prophet) said: Can you find a slave to set him free? He said: NO He (the Holy Prophet again) said: Can you observe fast for two consecutive months? He said: No. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Can you provide food to sixty poor people?, He said: No. He then sat down and (in the meanwhile) there was brought to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) a basket which contained dates. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Give these (dates) in charity. He (the man) said: Am I to give to one who is poorer than I? There is no family poorer than mine between the two lava plains of Medina. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) laughed so that his molar teeth became visible and said: Go and give it to your family to eat.
[2458]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Mubammad b. Muslim al-Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters, and he said: There was brought an 'araq containing dates, an 'araq being a huge basket. But in this hadith no men- tion has been made of (the fact) that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) laughed till his molar teeth became visible.
[2459]
Abu Huraira reported that a person had intercourse with his wife during Ramadan (while fasting). He asked for the religious verdict (about it) from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Can you find a slave (to grant him freedom) ? He said: No. He (the Holy Prophet again) said: Can you afford to observe fasts for two (consecutive) months ? He said: No. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Then feed sixty poor men.
[2460]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters that a person broke fast in Ramadan whereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded him to free a slave (as an atonement), and the rest of the hadith is the same as narrated by Ibn Uyaina.
[2461]
Humaid b. 'Abd al-Rahman reported that Abu Huraira had narrated to him that the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) commanded the person (who) broke the fast in Ramadan to free a slave or observe fasts for two (consecutive) months or feed sixty poor persons.
[2462]
This hadith has been narrated with the same chain of transmitters on the authority of Zuhri.
[2463]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that a person came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: I am burnt, whereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: How is it? He (the person) said: I had intercourse with my wife during the day in Ramadan. Upon this (the Holy Prophet) said: Give charity, give charity. He (the person) said: There is nothing with me. He commanded him to sit down, (In the meanwhile) there were brought to him (to the Holy Prophet) two baskets containing eatables, whereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) told him to give them as sadaqa.
[2464]
'Abbad b. Abdullah b. Zubair narrated that he heard 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) saying: A person came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and he then narrated the hadith. But (neither these words are found):"Give charity, give charity" (nor) his words: "during the day time".
[2465]
Abbad b. Abdullah b. Zubair reported that he had heard 'A'isha, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), as saying: A person came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the mosque during (the month of) Ramadan and said: Messenger of Allah, I am burnt I am burnt, whereupon the Mes- senger of Allah (may peace be upon him) asked him as to what the matter was. Upon this he said: I had intercourse with my wife (in a state of fasting) Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Give charity. Upon this he said: Apostle of Allah, I swear by God, there is nothing with me (to give in charity) as I do not possess anything. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Sit down. So he sat down and he was in this very state when there came a person urging a donkey with a load of eatables upon it. The Mes- senger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Where is that burnt one who was just here? Thereupon the person stood up. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Give this (eatables brought by the man) in charity. Upon this the person said: Messenger of Allah, can there be anyone else (more deserving than I)? By Allah. we are hungry, we have nothing with us. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: Then eat (these eatables).
[2466]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) went out during the month of Ramadan in the year of Victory (when Mecca was conquered) and was fasting till he reached Kadid (a canal situated at a distance of forty-two miles from Mecca) and he then broke the fast. And it was the habit of the Companions of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) to follow him in every new thing (or act). So they followed him also (in this matter).
[2467]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters. Yahya (one of the narrators) said that Sufyan (the narrator) had stated: I do not know whose statement it is: "It is the last word of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) which is accepted as (final as it abrogates the previous ones)."
[2468]
It has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters that breaking of fast (in a journey) is the final of the two commands (whether one may fast or one may break it), and it is the last command of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) which is to be accepted as final. Zuhri said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) marched on Mecca on the morning of 14th of Ramadan (lit. when thirteen nights had passed).
[2469]
A hadlth like this has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Shibab who said that they (the Compnions of the Holy Prophet) followed the latest of his commands and looked upon it as one abrogating (the previous ones) and the most firm.
[2470]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) journeyed during the month of Ramadan in a slate of fasting till he reached 'Usfan. He then ordered a cup containing drinking water and he drank that openly so that the people might see it, and broke the fast (and did not resume it) till he reached Mecca. Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) fasted and broke the fast, so he who wished fasted and he who wished to break it broke it.
[2471]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Do not condemn one who observes fast, or one who does not observe (in a journey). for the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) observed fast in a journey or he did not observe it (too).
[2472]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went out to Mecca in Ramadan in the year of Victory, and he and the people fasted till he came to Kura' al-Ghamim and the people also fasted. He then called for a cup of water which he raised till the people saw it, and then he drank. He was told afterwards that some people had continued to fast, and he said: These people are the disobedient ones; these are the disobedient ones.
[2473]
This hadith has been narrated by Ja'far with the some chain of trans- mitters and he added: It was said to him (to the Holy Prophet): There are people to whom fasting has become unbearable and they are waiting how you do. He (the Holy Prophet) then called for a cup of water when it was afternoon. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[2474]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with both of them) reported that in the course of a journey Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw a man, people crowding around him and providing him a shade. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: What is the matter with him? They said: He is a person observing fast. Whereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: It is no righteousness that you fast on journey.
[2475]
'Amr b. al-Hasan is reported to have said that he heard Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with both of them) as saying that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) saw a man. The rest of the hadith is the same as mentioned above.
[2476]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters but with this addition that he (the Holy Prophet) said: "Take advantage of the concession of Allah Who Wanted it to you." When he (one of the narrators) asked him (the other one, Yabya b. Abi Kathar) he did not retain it in his mind.
[2477]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We went out on an expedition with Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him)on the 16th of Ramadan. Some of us fasted and some of us broke the fast. But neither the observer of the fast found fault with one who broke it, nor the breaker of the fast found fault with one who observed it.
[2478]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Qatada with the same chain of transmitters by different narrators (except this difference) that in the hadith transmitted by Taimi and Umar b. Amir and Hisham (the date of setting out is) 18th, and in the hadith transmitted by Sa'id it is the 12th, and in the one transmitted by Shu'ba it is the 17th or 19th.
[2479]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We went out on an expedition with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) during Ramadan and neither the observer of the fast was found fault with for his fasting, nor the breaker of the fast for breaking it.
[2480]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We went out on an expedition with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) during Ramadan. Some of us observed the fast and some of us broke it. Neither the observer of the fast had any grudge against one who broke it, nor the breaker of the fast had any grudge against one who had fasted They knew that he who had strength enough (to bear its rigour) fasted and that was good, and they also found that he who felt weakness (and could not bear the burden) broke it, and that was also good.
[2481]
Abu Nadra reported Abu Sa'id al.Khudri and Jabir b. Abdullah as saying: We travelled with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). The observer of the fast observed it, and the breaker of the fast broke it, but none of them found fault with each other.
[2482]
Humaid reported that Anas (Allah be pleased with him) was asked about fasting during Ramadan while travelling. He said: We travelled with the MesseDger of Allah (may peace be upon him) during the month of Ramadan, but neither the ob- server of the fast found fault with the breaker of the fast, nor the breaker of the fast found fault with the observer of the fast.
[2483]
Abu Khalid al-Ahmar narrated from Humaid who said: I went out and was fasting; they said to me: Break (lit go back, repeat). He said that Anas reported that the Companions of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to set out on a journey and neither the observer of the fast found fault with the breaker of the fast, nor the breaker of the fast found fault with the observer of the fast. (One of the narrators Humaid said): I met Ibn Abi Mulaika who informed me the same thing on the authority of 'A'isha.
[2484]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We were with the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) on a journey. Some of us had been observing the fast and some of us had not been fasting. We got down at a place on a hot day. Most of us had the cloth for shelter. There were also those amongst us who sheltered (themselves against the rays of the) sun with the help of their hands. The observers of the fast fell down (on account of weakness). Those who had not observed it got up and pitched tents and watered the mounts. Thereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The breakers of the fast have taken away the reward today.
[2485]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was journeying (along with his Companions). Some of them had observed the fast whereas the others had broken it. Those who did not fast girded up their loins and worked, but the observers of the fast were too weak to work. Upon this he (the Apostle of Allah) said: Today the breakers of the fast have gone with the reward.
[2486]
Qaza'a reported: I came to Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) and he was surrounded (by people), and when they dispersed I said to him: I am not going to ask you about what these people were asking. I ask you about fasting on a journey. Upon this he said: We travelled with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) towards Mecca and we had been observing fast. We halted at a place. There the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: You are nearing your enemy and breaking of fast would give you greater strength, and that was a concession (given to us). But some of us continued to observe the fast and some of us broke it. We then got down at another place and he (the Holy Prophet) said: You are going to encounter the enemy in the morning and breaking of the fast would give you strength, so break the fast. As it was a point of stress, so we broke the fast. But subsequently we saw ourselves observing the fast with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on a journey.
[2487]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Hamza b. 'Amr al-Aslami asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about fasting on a journey, and he (the Holy Prophet) said: Fast if you like and break it if you like.
[2488]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Hamza b. Amr al-Aslami asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) thus: Messenger of Allah, I am a person devoted much to fasting. Should I fast during the journey? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Fast if you like and break it if you like.
[2489]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[2490]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters that Hamza said: I am a person much used to fasting. Should I fast during the journey? (The rest of the hadith is the same.)
[2491]
Hamza b. 'Amr al-Aslami (Allah be pleased with him) said: Messenger of Allah, I find strength in me for fasting on a journey; is there any sin upon me (in doing it) ? Thereupon the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: It is a concession from Allah.He who took advantage of it, it is good for him, and he who preferred to observe fast, there is no sin upon him. Harun (one of the narrators) in his narration said:'lt is a concession, and he made no mention of "from Allah".
[2492]
Abu Darda' (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We set out during the month of Ramadan with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in such an intense heat that one of us would place his hand over his head (in order to protect himself) against the excessive heat, and none among us was observing the fast, except the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and 'Abdullah b. Rawaha.
[2493]
Abu Darda' reported: We were with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on some of his journeys on an intensely hot day so much so that a person would place his hand on his head (in order to protect himself) against excessive heat, and none amongst us was fasting but the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and Abdullah b. Rawaha
[2494]
Umm al-Fadl bint- al-Harith reported that some people argued about the fasting of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the day of 'Arafa. Some of them said that he had been fasting, whereas the others said that he had not been fasting.I sent a cup of milk to him while he was riding his camel at 'Arafa, and he drank it.
[2495]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Nadr with the same chain of transmitters, but he did not mention that he was mounting (riding on) his camel.
[2496]
This hadith has been narrated by Abu Nadr on the authority of Umair, the freed slave of Umm al-Fadl, through the same chain of transmitters.
[2497]
Umm al-Fadl (Allah be pleased with her) is reported to have said that some people among the Companions of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) were in doubt about fasting on the day of 'Arafa and we were with him on that day. I (Umm al-Fadl) sent him a cup of milk and he was halting at 'Arafa, and he drank that.
[2498]
Kuraib, the freed slave of Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with him), reported from Maimuna, the wife of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), that people had doubt about the fasting of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on the day of 'Arafa. Maimuna sent him a cup of milk and he was halting at a place and he drank it and the people were seeing him.
[2499]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her)reported that the Quraish used to fast on the day of 'Ashura in the pre-Islamic days and the Messenger ot Allah (may peace be upon him) also observed it. When he migrated to Medina, he himself observed this fast and commanded (others) to observe it. But when fasting during the month of Ramadan was made obligatory he said: He who wishes to observe this fast may do so, and he who wishes to abandon it may do so.
[2500]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters, but he made no mention in the first part of the hadith that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to observe fast, and said about the second part that he abandoned the (fast) of Ashura, and he who wished observed the fast and who wished otherwise abandoned it,and he did not hold it as the words of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as mentioned in the narration transmitted by Jarir.